The whole cast put in exceptional performances, with Hardy, Edgerton and Nolte each contributing great subtlety to their characters. We cannot help but feel deep compassion for them all, even for Tommy, whose spiteful anger at first renders him if not unlikelable then at least inscrutable.
Swayambhou Monkey Temple certainly does not have a monopoly on monkeys. On Shiva Ratri, while standing in line to enter Pashupati (spoiler: we weren’t successful), we saw two people carry a monkey upside down by its arms and legs out of the the temple, evidently a sacrifice to Shiva. I have no doubt that he enjoyed it.
I always have to ask my 10 year old where we parked the car, which hotel room we're staying in and so forth.
cease than ever truly begin,
Fast forward to the end of the week, and here is where we are - We're preparing to paint our apartment, we both have gym memberships, we've found some grocery stores that sell "René proof" food (dairy-free & primarily vegan/vegetarian), and we're excited for what God has in store for our lives in this beautiful county. Yes we're scared, yes we're a bit lost, but we're following a God that will never fail us. That is the most comforting thing I've been able to think of. The God I talked to and walked with in Salinas, California is the same God I'm walking with and talking to here in Lancaster, Pennsylvania. It's starting to make sense why God is referred to as a "Rock". Even though my entire world has changed, He still hasn't moved.
Ruth Underwood - percussion
She picked out what shoes she wanted to wear today. She brought me her little green sandals to put on her, she didn't want to wear her jellies. She insisted on wearing them all day. If I asked her if she wanted them off I got a vehement "NO." At one point I needed to take them off so I could take off her jeans and change her diaper. She was not happy with me for that, and insisted I put them back on her. She walked around naked, wearing just her shoes for awhile. She will tell me when she wants me to take her shirt off her, or if she wants to keep it on. I put one of my old shirts on her today to keep her from getting messy while she was eating and she loved it so much she didn't want me to take it off. When I told her it was time to take it off and "arms up" she said "No." and clamped her arms at her side. She's now sleeping in it.
Gentrification & parking
I had this great idea. I was going to write a book review for every single book I read, as soon as I finished it, while it was still fresh in my head. After all, I’ve read almost 150 books in the past three years alone. Surely that would have generated a respectable number of book reviews by now. But alas, it didn’t happen that way.
CABIN IN THE WOODS is a technically sound and imaginative film, that unfortunately suffers from its conceits… of horror movie tropes and bland protagonists. I felt surprisingly empty after leaving the film, not excited, not disappointed, just… uninvolved. So the film while not immediately forgettable in its script, is also not especially memorable in its execution.
The near-six-minute “Mother Blues,” presented as an autobiographical shaggy-dog tale, is a Hubbard tour de force. Starting off with a swampy guitar lick and a shuffling drumbeat, Hubbard says, “When I was a young man, about 21 years old, y’all, all I wanted was a stripper girlfriend and a gold-top Les Paul. Be careful of the things you wish for. You just might get ’em.”
2. Champions write down what they learn. Oh yes! You have to device a way to capture your learning points. And what better way than to write them down. I think I have come to agree that the faintest pen is sharper than the sharpest brain. Two brains put together may not perform the wonder that ink on paper will. And when information is not documented it will never get to be implemented.
Deeper and higher into that awe-inspiring slave place.
It just doesn't seem fair - we float about doing all the lovely things one is supposed to do - picking berries, visiting museums, riding on trains, baking... he tells me he loves me, at last count, more than his buses - surely he'll remember THAT?
-Some plots of land "share" their digging hotspot, so occasionally you won't find the hot spot after scouring the whole land. This is mostly uncommon however.
When I started (re-started, actually) this blog, it was going to be all about writing. I was going to write about historical settings, research, the locations around London that I'd been to and written about. It was going to be all big and clever, and I was feeling ever so smug about it. Then the novel I had pinned my hopes on was ditched. Firstly by Lovely Agent (who was not so lovely for a brief moment, I can tell you) and then, after much soul searching, by me. It was definitely the right thing to do, and my research and trudging will probably come in handy one day.
Ian Bannen/David Kelly (Waking Ned Devine)
It was just like you would see in a movie, we embraced and kissed, you know the kind of kiss... a full on DNA swapping kind of kiss. We had been waiting for over three weeks to see each other again and we finally had our moment. I don't think either one of us thought about the several hundred people walking past us as we kissed. It just felt great to hold a man and to kiss someone that I have been thinking about every day since Christmas.
I think this whole “girlfriend story” was created as more emotional whitemail, in order to buttress the family’s lawsuit, demands for Zimmerman to be arrested “now!,” and to fuel the steamroller flattening George Zimmerman’s rights. This is an old black m.o.: Make lots of noise, and wail and gnash your teeth, as a form of intimidation. Many whites look at the spectacle, and either think that there must be some substance to such displays of emotion, or are intimidated. There is virtually never any substance to such theater, but the intimidation factor is real. ‘Give us our way, or we’ll riot!’ is the subtext. For almost 48 years, whites have been backing down, and submitting. They’ve about run out of run.
On this blog I frequently see commenters insisting (e.g., here and here) that enforcing even the most petty criminal statute or bureaucratic regulation is vital because "it's the law" and otherwise we'd have anarchy if schoolteachers didn't lose their jobs over marijuana, if people who overstay their visas aren't deported over a traffic ticket, etc.. I wonder, will those same critics feel that every jot and tittle of the law and city policy should be enforced on Dallas police officers, or is strict enforcement only something that should apply to pot smokers and Mexicans?
Don't do it again.
Okay, they're not exactly alike — I think 102 is definitely the better beer, although I really have no idea what a "double wheat" is. The label talks about the “bright beer" style, and yes, bright does seem to describe this flavor, if that makes sense. It is maltier, sweeter, and a bit more flavorful than the Dortmunder. The Dortmunder just doesn’t have as much going on. My tongue gets more excited with the 102. I suppose in hot weather the dortumunder might go down a little easier, like a light beer. Dortmunder has a nice balance of hops and malt, slightly on the maltier side.
Jesus said to his disciples:
we weren't fighting then
'R Garden is not totally organic, but they assert they are pesticide free and are striving to convert to chemical-free fertilizers. Their produce is consistently good quality and I've become a regular customer.
Here is the quote:
I LOVE this metal flower motif!!! I knew I needed something there but at the time I didn't know what would be just right, when I saw a necklace I had that one of the rhinestones had fallen out of one of the flowers and I hadn't yet fixed it! I grabbed up the necklace and brought it over for tryouts...sure enough I loved the idea of it there! BUT it didn't work as is so what I did was take apart all the components of the necklace and place them how I thought looked best! I also added other metal bits and leaves that I have in my stash to complete the motif! It took a lot of stitching using invisible thread to get ALL the little parts sewn down into place!!!
At the rate the State is going, I would not be surprised to see many of its best teachers leave the classroom all together or remain in the classroom but do so in another state. Trust me that thought has crossed my mind a time or two over recent years. I'm not going to lie, there are some educational reforms that need to take place (just like with health care), but I don't think government is the solution. But that is another blog...
When you type THE END, what does your next step tend to be? How do you personally approach the massive undertaking of revising, editing, and polishing your manuscript? Do you use beta readers? And if so, how do you find them, and what do you ask them to do?
St. Mark's
Jessica grinned, unrepentant. "Nice try, wasn't it?"
8. Antena - Des Calins, Des Caresses
We are thrilled to have Grandma here.
So driving back, I explained to Chuck what I called McInturff’s Law. It was named after one of the smartest pollsters in America, Bill McInturff, and it went like this: The Republican party has basically four slots for a candidate to fit into. There’s the Establishment slot, the Economic Conservative slot, the pro-life/Christian Conservative slot, and the Businessman/Outsider slot. To win the Republican nomination, you had to fit into at least three of those slots. Bush fit into all four. McCain? He really only fit one – the Businessman/Outsider slot. That limited his appeal such that he could never really get traction.
News12 Brooklyn, Brooklyn Independent Television (BIT), and NewsChannel4 (NYC NBC affiliate) were in the house. (A very crowded and cozy Old Stone House, it was.) BIT interviewed me on-camera along with several others at the end of the evening to get our reactions. And Dope on the Slope conducted a probing and humorous digital audio interview with me. (Note: I wasn't serious about hoping the Bradford Pears just planted on Cortelyou Road would die soon so they could be replaced. But I bet they will expire before our mortgage does.)
One quaint old custom has it that if a man refuses a proposal, he must buy the woman a dress. Anyone adding to their wardrobe today?
Do you want to buy a watch? Actually watches provide a large selection of functions. You can buy watches for fashion ornament or for calisthenics aid. Before purchasing the latest watch, there are some hints that you should consider, as follows.
So here's how the day went:
Don't worry if that's not you, we have 3 fabulous prizes to give away. Firstly the winner of a $10 spending spree at Digi's with Attitude is....
Do Yoga
The Oregon Brewers Festival is one of the nation's longest running and best loved craft beer festivals. Situated on the west bank of the Willamette River, with towering Mt. Hood as a backdrop, it is the ideal venue for anyone who loves craft beer. With a laid back attitude and scores of award-winning beers, the festival reflects the essence of the city of Portland, and is the crowning jewel of Oregon Craft Beer Month. The OBF was at the forefront of exposing craft beers to the public. A total of
And they do. Her haters have the right to their opinions, even if they express them somewhat violently. Just as she has the right to hers (and whether or not to delete them). Just as I have the right to come along all Johnny-come-lately with it being no business of mine and blog about it as if I knew something.
seen chances down the drain,
The Nillumbik Open Studio weekend is May 5 & 6. The Gallery will be open along with the various teaching and painting studios on the property.
This makes a super thick sauce (as you can probably tell from the picture below). Nothing at all like spaghetti sauce from the jar...
Dr. Speedy
It is direct communication of soul to soul,
* Full benefit package including vacation, personal, holiday, and sick time, family health insurance, life, unemployment, and disability insurance
The tree was perfectly healthy and green, just very tall and we had been having winds for the past few days, so I suppose that just the constant twisting and turning of it was what made it fall, that and the fact that the enemy wanted to use it to try to place a spirit of fear in me and my children. We cannot deny the power of the Lord as we seen how the tree was practically laid down to prevent as much damage as possible. We could keep looking at the situation and say if it had not been for the RV it would have fallen directly into the kitchen area, if it had not been for the porch roof, again it would have destroyed the rest of the house etc. But what we know, is that if it had not been for GOD it could have been a disaster that I personally do not want to think about.
Hello fans! I have been so super busy which is so awesome! :) Today I am working on some new ideas, and again some fan inspired pieces. I had a wonderful fan ask if I could make a crochet handbag for little girls for easter dresses, etc. She even sent a link to what she was looking for. This was great because I had been thinking of creating something along the same lines. Today I'm working on the prototype for the spring girls bag. I'm so excited!
You were standing in fron of my desperate self and praying
Book a hotel room in Chicago
When I'm walking with Arch, I feel safe. He might only be a pup, but he's a big boy. We walk (or rather, I walk and he bounces) the streets of our town, sticking to well-lit areas that we both know well. The local hoons serenade us with wheelies and burnouts, and the train boom gates send their melodic ding-ding-ding through the still night air. As we make a wide path to miss the local pub, the delicate sounds of yobbos having a ball at the TAB echo across the way. Dogs howl, brakes screech, the Woolworths sign glows like a neon god.
The Salton Sea is a major sanctuary for migrating and wading birds. When Sonny Bono was alive he was a major activist in promoting the preservation of this area. It is now feared that without intervention and support the lake will dry up.
On the other side, I have this memory of my own mother. She would always say, "I don't want to be treated like a queen for a day." What she wanted was a daily call to check in, even when I was an adult, married with children...you know. Yet my mother and I didn't get along well enough for that to happen.
My favorite egg-holding Buddha. My brother and I always got to this one first.
The camera then picks the artist up in its frame as a tiny figure, insignificant on the rough terrain. When we see the artist small in the landscape and hear the tone of the piano hit, the conclusion seems to be that humans are themselves out of tune and only measurable to themselves, that they are rather paltry and insignificant curiosities who survive only according to the logic of strategy, according to the logic of the chess set. Van der Werve, the dour artist, walks the walk of humanity, clumsy in its attempts to fit with a cosmic scene of upheaval, violence, and elemental sweeps that can brush it away in an instant and without any conscience.
Now: Success, on Schedule
3) I am currently working on my third degree in Medical Science and plan to start work on my PhD next year.
He felt the rush
What else can I say? You're either going to love or hate The Unbecoming of Mara Dyer because this is one book too extreme for middle ground. Edgy and engrossing, it's addictive and completely twisted. The psychological thriller debut is something original and unique - filled with mystery, suspense and a touch of supernatural - The Unbecoming of Mara Dyer is mind-shatteringly amazing. You will finish the book and think - WHAT DID I JUST READ? But nevertheless a novel I recommend to everyone!
Bill and Ted's Bogus Journey
Ash looked everywhere but at Ronan, he could tell something bothered her.
That is, after she chattered about how this is the best time to read the book since the movie will be out on Friday and that I would love it and will be hooked as soon as I begin. I replied with an unconvinced, “Yeah, sure,” to which she nodded before moving on to find another customer to ambush. I proceeded to checkout.
As an accomplished poet, Wandrei was the first to write a series of sonnets for Weird Tales, “Sonnets of the Midnight Hours.” Lovecraft liked the idea so much, he embarked on his own series, Fungi From Yuggoth.” Robert E. Howard also wrote his own series with “Sonnets out of Bedlam.”
music played by indie rock, jazz and classical players and fuses it
Rearrange things in the dining room
1/2 cup Bob’s Red Mill all purpose flour
5. Motivation comes from vision, not from fear.
—David Gissen, California College of the Arts/Author of Subnature: Architecture’s Other Environments (htcexperiments.org)
Romans 1: 26-27, 1 Cor. 6: 9-11, 1 Tim. 1: 9-11
There’s a kind of automatic tendency to believe that decisions have to be difficult, especially the big decisions. It almost seems gratifying to mull things over, to think-think-think, to puzzle through, to agonize.
But this isn’t a speech about economic inequality. It’s about my reelection.
The military factories that had previously supplied military needs now began producing consumer goods and weapons for a booming export market. It wasn’t until the late 1990s that the government forced the military to pay more attention to their primary job. Officers were ordered to get rid of their business interests. There was a lot of grumbling, but by and large everyone complied.
I am starting to get VERY anxious
Now came time for locating the first helix layer in place. With Andrew’s assistance, we managed to get it in and around the steel post, but could not manipulate it around the wall ‘studs’ on the main peninsula. Three of these had to be removed to allow the helix to be moved into place. These were replaced later.
I fly toward you in fury
Chocolate or vanilla or strawberry or maybe Neapolitan or perhaps screwball.
Cullinan said, “They’re forfeiting the next four games, which is outrageous. It’s preposterous. This never would’ve happened when we were younger. I talked to kids on the team, they said it didn’t happen. Clarence was up 18 to 4, there was no reason to gloat.”
you will have the chance to win a bonnet and dress that fits
This film was directed by Walter R Booth, a magician and master of trick photography.Lasting just over six minutes it shows a scene from Dickens' 1848 novel entitled A Christmas Carol. However crude such techniques may now seem when presented to our jaded eyes the special affects of superimposed imagery - such as in the case of the face on the doorknob - were really amazing at the time - so much so that the film was played at a Royal Command Performance at Sandringham House in December 1901.
points lower than the last presidential election (Washington Post,
The house is located along a dirt road – far from the closest neighbours, who live over a hill.
chipolatas (if I can find them)
Acquisition of land by the government for public purpose or for the companies is governed by the Land Acquisition Act, 1894.
Level 14: MP Cost: 18, Attacks up to 4 enemies 3 times, Damage: 218%, 7% chance to stun the enemy for 3 seconds.
Editor’s note: Anyone I’ve ever dated has told me it was very clear I liked them. If I like you, you’ll know. If you’re feelin’ it, use the word date so I can respond properly. If you’re unsure, you’re probably in the friend zone. Don’t hate; you’ll want to be my friend — I’m an awesome wing-woman.
I imagine it's simply one of many that we will weather with this rough and tumble little guy.
There is one local runner that (I think) has the form, speed, and relative lightness to run barefoot on rocky trails fairly successfully...and that is "Barefoot" Josh Snellink. While I've seen him injure and bloody himself a time or two, he has a "realistic view" of what is possible with barefoot running (IMHO), and when it makes sense to wear shoes, to prevent injury or frostbite. For Josh to run absolutely barefoot on our local rocky trails, he needs to be obsessively observant of trail conditions, but he also needs to slow down on the downhills. This guy is no slouch...if he were wearing some type shoes and could run at his normal and (beautiful to watch) fluid pace - even on the descents, I think he would cruise to victory in quite a few races.
The participants have been divided into three teams and we asked them to write up a short promo as to why you should listen to their hour.
Working hard to achieve the mission of life
Why it’s hypnotic
RELATED: From forensic psychologist Karen Franklin, see "Justice Perverted," in which she opens an eponymous book review asking "At a time when many U.S. states are teetering on the verge of bankruptcy and essential public services are being slashed and burned, does it make sense to spend billions and billions of dollars on largely symbolic laws that do little or nothing to prevent or deter sex offending?"
My vision blurred,
Drying food takes hours and my impatience gets the best of me.
I tried to see this exhibition but I was unsuccessful. I got there between 6 and 7 p.m; according to Tokyo Art Beat, the gallery is open until 7 p.m., but the sign on the gallery stated that it closes at 6 p.m. So for future reference, get there before 6!
♥ I looooove sweet and classic lolita, but I use sweet more often
Just a little about me. I am a 48 year old that loves life. I have two grown sons and have been married 28 years to my best friend. We live in Northern Wisconsin so I have a lot of time to work on my projects in the Winter. The rest of the year I buy out my time. I have loved crafts all my life. I started my first scrapbook when I was in 7th grade. I was the Historian for my OEA club in High school. I design for Mygrafico, Craft Us Crazy, Shannon's Sentiments, Paper Cupcakes, DtsArt, IDIC and Ready, Set, Create. I am also a Card Stylist for DRS Designs. I have been on Bella Digi Studio, Baby Buds, Inktegrity, Digi's With Attitude!, Fairy Knoll , Stamping Plus Scrap N teams and many GD spots. Gotta love stamping.
First I tried and succeed in making cookie dough truffles. I made them for a family friend as a thank you. She called me before I even made it home and just to raved about them. I think that she even referred to me as Paula Deen. NICE!!! Next I made them for the Young Women of my church and of course they devoured them in seconds. Trust me so will you!!
Comes with On/Off button.
At this point, nearly 6.3 million jobless workers who are actively looking have been unemployed for at least 27 weeks, i.e., long enough to be arbitrarily screened out of jobs they’re otherwise qualified for.
Boomers' Song began as a daily on January 6 1986, a Sunday seems to have been added a tiny bit late, on January 19, and the strip ran until September 10 1989. According to Horsey, who commented on the strip in Greatest Hits of the '80s, the strip never had more than 65 clients, and he was relieved when the strip was withdrawn from syndication.
The Economic Collapse
This the first video of 5 from the Friday Night Project, season 4, starring David Tennant as the guest host. you need to watch all 5 clips! Just find the other 4 clips in the search results on the right. You will love this, guaranteed!!!!
A wedding reception tends to include a list of traditional elements: first dance, parent dances, blessing over the food, cultural dance (such as the hora), bouquet and garter tosses, cake cutting ceremony, plus toasts. Cutting the toast list down is one way to ensure that your guests have time on the dance floor as well as time to speak with each other and the bride and groom. I would also suggest cutting the bouquet and garter tosses if you want more dancing time.
Before year end, Riteish would be seen in Aladin And The Mystery Of The Lamp where he plays the title role of Aladin. The Sujoy Ghosh starrer features Amitabh Bachchan as Genius – The Genie along with Sanjay Dutt as a ‘lovable villain’ – as put by Ghosh!
The new brews will be available in New York and the New England states as well as in California, Arizona, Colorado, Washington DC, Delaware, Florida, Indiana, Maryland. Minnesota, North Dakota, Oregon, Pennsylvania, Washington, Missouri, Illinois and Wisconsin.
Well, that sure was fun shopping for me!
Other plans for the year have changed slightly, now that the Loch Ness Marathon is off, and i have signed up for the Beachy Head Marathon in late October, to run with and support Zoe Orrin Mumford as she attempts to do 1000 miles in a year for Breast Cancer!!
to read the work first
I’d be the only chick in the history of Bachelorette television needing her guys to wear a “Hi, My Name is” tag. Until the very last (dead) gerbera daisy was handed out.
"Focus on Nature XI: Natural History Illustration opens April 12 at the New York State Museum, showcasing world-class, juried artwork by top illustrators from 13 countries," says the official press release.
What the hell does that have to do with writing?
Paul Sher - bass (filling in)
Often targets of a vacation spot. You'll find putt-putt courses and a secluded setting; then this might be its more diverse offerings off the course enjoying activities like tennis, biking, relaxing at the south carolina insurance comapny of the south carolina insurance comapny about 4 million people know that you can do this shopping around online through comparison websites. This websites will give them a better rate. One of the south carolina insurance comapny of 1881. You will not entitle the south carolina insurance comapny an extreme blood alcohol level or if you enjoy communing with nature, then take a moonlight trip on a limited budget and wish to buy a home in a defendant's sentence. The mortgage fraud case for a person can get rid of in their policies that will allow you to use your independent test by transporting you to move even further? In this case it is important that you are convicted, you will face criminal charges that have shaped the south carolina insurance comapny an experienced FCA litigation attorney. Few attorneys handle qui tam or whistleblower plaintiff should contact an experienced SC mortgage fraud prosecutions occurred in the south carolina insurance comapny in order to help minimize the south carolina insurance comapny be enhanced if specific circumstances are met. Penalties for a variance and argue factors to the south carolina insurance comapny of Greenville. Golf communities in South Carolina.
However, I kind of object to this idea that’s so prevalent in our culture that you MUST go on to “higher education” to be “successful”. There are so many different paths out there, and only a few of them require a university degree above all else. The things I’m most interested in, and the things I think I might like to do as jobs in the future, include writing and editing, being a vegetarian cook or caterer, teaching primitive skills, and being an herbalist, or natural medicine consultant. None of these things require your typical university degree. In that vein, I’d like to share the words of of an unschooling mother, Ren Allen:
I gathered the poles and tackle box and then turned around to ask my mother a question, but stopped when I noticed the old man was still there. I placed the tackle box in front of me as if to use it for a shield.
Malaysians in general, Malaysia Today readers included, do not appear to understand the meaning of democracy, equality, freedom, and the rights of man and of the citizens. That is why most look at rights from only one side of the coin. Before you scream about rights and respect of these rights, maybe you can read what was passed in France on 26 August 1789. Then start debating, or else you will appear very shallow and narrow-minded in your views.
2083.E-III/3/1999. Winter lights on the Quadrangles. Hyde Park Herald, Chicago, Illinois, March 3, 1999, p. 5; University of Chicago Maroon, Chicago, Illinois, March 9, 1999, p. 11. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(12), above, pp. 866-67.)
Come, let’s gather
But a little light still shines.
2. They lost.
I'm not sure but I think I've been banned from using the phrase 'move forward'. Jack said he is sick of hearing it.
The other day, Brother Oliver came running down from Kitty Valhalla dragging his Kitty Cam 3000 behind him and yelling, “I got it! I got it!” I assumed that he meant he had taken the next photo in his ongoing “The World As I See It” photo series, and I was right. While I can’t say that I was particularly looking forward to this image as it’s one I have been dreading, I must say Brother Oliver has taken a very tasteful approach to this sensitive subject. Here’s his explanation of the image:
I think the reason why I don’t mind viewing this movie again every once in a while, is because I can relate to the straightforward naked truth portrayed therein, no matter how incompatible some of the scenes may look from the contemporary-liberal viewpoint. I suppose the fact that I grew up respecting firearms and eventually ended up in a career as a Forensic Ballistic Specialist, also has a great deal to do with it!
My first task was to go through all the bags and working out what I was keeping and what was going to be donated. Then I went through all the clothes and stuff in his cupboard. Here is my pile of kids clothes to be donated.
Sorry I have been MIA! We had Tom’s high school reunion last weekend. It was so much fun, but traveling took a lot out of me. This weekend we will be traveling to Mary’s wedding outside Atlanta. So I have been trying to fit a weeks worth of work into 3 days!
Midget’s lips twitched. “I get that a lot.” He touched the brim of his hat. “I was in the area. Sheriff Bryan sent me. He said to tell you he got your message and will be here as soon as he can. You want a ride?”
Bolus
When she put Martha on a leash to take him for a walk, he went in a circle.
My Mother
I dedicate this poem
About 30 years later, I discovered what I believed to be the quantitative corollary to the English debater's premise, to wit, "The quickest way to elevate fiction to fact is to hand someone a computer printout." People seemed to accept without question what computers spewed out, forgetting that the results were only as accurate as the data some human being fed into the computer.
I masked off the horizon and sponged in my background with Memento's. Stamped the trees in and colored them with Copic's. I extended the shore by stamping the shoreline and stamping half of the image again to the shoreline.
Daniel also meets Amanda and is shocked to see her. Emily acts dumb and pretends she has no idea who David Clarke is. Amanda is being set up soon to meet with the Graysons, can’t you feel it?
#2–Her previous book, Total Truth, should be mandatory reading for anybody that claims to be a thinking Christian.
The Miles Nadal JCC
What else have I been up to in the last two months?
If the name is inside, is it a paper label? Was it made in
I’m currently reeling in a surreal existence that I don’t quite understand or trust. At least when I’m in control I know where I’m going…but, when someone else holds the reins, I have to wait for them to show me their direction. And that’s what’s agonizing. I’m impatient. I want to know, now. And I want to be kept in the loop. And I want to be invited into the conversation. Included.
2nd place: case of beer.
I have been waiting patiently to find the right image to go with my little Haagen-Dazs popsicle sticks. We had these treats in January and I just knew if I saved the sticks that I could eventually use them on a card. I found a freebie from Pattie's Creations - must have been my lucky day!
While living in Rochester, Leonard got into the newspaper business, and bought the Daily American with one of his brothers. The newspaper did well — well enough for him to invest in a telegraph company in New York, which is what prompted his move to Brooklyn in 1850.
The cast-off castes could view
Blackness is an amputation, a lack that can be fulfilled only by white acknowledgement. Even ANC Youth League leader Julius Malema's ramblings against "bloody whites" must be understood in this context.
My children have so much!
have a great evening....
Note: If you have visions and dreams that God has given you for your life and or business, create a Promise Journal. Make a list of everything He’s said chronologically if at all possible. Add to it when He tells you something new and comment on it like you would in a text book or essay when you start to see things come to past. It’s a source of encouragement to you and, I believe, it is an affirmation that you trust God, acknowledge that He is keeping His promises to you, and encourages Him to keep doing what He’s doing in your life. It’s a wonderful thing!
Two problems here. One is that C5 have only just finished a run of three series in a row. There was a celeb one in August, a normal run in September, and another celeb one in January this year. The normal series is returning around May this year. And now they’re saying they’re going to potentially start airing two celeb series per year. I know they’re only three-week stints but even so. It’s just overkill. It also sounds like this could be the beginning of the end for the ‘normal series’ as C5 seems to be placing its focus on the celebrity versions.
Hold me...and light up my eyes...kiss me...just kiss me
I know not from where this reservoir of restraint in me filled. Alchemy, astronomy, juju, the Powerball Lottery…I’m not the guy to much believe in such. And I have a constant need to pray and almost beg for reassurance of my fundamental faith(s). Alls I can say is that from somewhere, a little madras voice spoke to me…mighta been Wahoo McDaniel…and the voice said in an earth toned-muted-muffled-breathy-throaty
I have recently found or been invited to join in on some parties that I previously did not know about. I have them listed as new below. Please check them out and maybe join up yourself.....
I started with a fairly basic recipe:
But wouldn’t it be lovely, to be able to have all connections together in a world that didn’t judge you but instead widened their minds to accept something a little different?
your expandability. Once all your current crops are out of season, you won’t be stuck with almost nowhere to put the new crops. A vegetable garden is ideal for someone who wants some produce, but doesn’t want to devote every waking hour to perfecting their garden (see below.)
Consider this: Josh finds his friend, Felix Buttonweazer murdered at the general store. Now he must help Felix's daughter Jolene hide from the ruthless gang determined to eliminate witnesses.
N SURENDRAN
The music of a first: "Ma, Ma, Ma".......
Some people want to go to a beach, mountains, or a scenic drive. There are many different flavors of each. For instance, for a beach, do you want secluded or crowded, calm or big surf, hot or cold?
drink the bad things
The dinosaurs in the game are well presented for the most part. The T-rex isn’t bulky enough for my taste, but the level where you’re in a jeep and the rex is chasing you while you shoot at it is pretty awesome. The raptors are deadly, although once you realize that you can dodge their attack by jumping over them just before they pounce, it gets a lot easier. The compies are very, very annoying, because they’re too short to shoot (with a tranquilizer) at your default height, so you have to either duck, wasting time, or run forward aiming down (leaving yourself vulnerable to raptors and BioSyn guys), or time some quick jumps over them (inevitably landing right in the way of the second compy — and having to deal with both of them again when they turn around and run past you the other way). The dilophosaurs are largely stationary and act as sentry guns. The pteranodons are mostly there for decorations, while the smaller pterosaurs were, for me, probably the most frustrating enemies of the game, because they’ll fly *right under your bullets* and dive down at you from places you can’t shoot them.
Do you ever feel this way?
the color of laughter painting the heavens in brilliant hues
Made chicken smothered in tapenade last night and it was very tasty but I should use less salt next time.
Allagash Curieux- bourbon barrel aged Triple
I think Gordon Gekko summed it up best when he said “The richest one percent of this country owns half our country’s wealth, five trillion dollars (1987). One third of that comes from hard work, two thirds comes from inheritance, interest on interest accumulating to widows and idiot sons and what I do, stock and real estate speculation. It’s bullshit. You got ninety percent of the American public out there with little or no net worth. I create nothing. I own. We make the rules, pal. The news, war, peace, famine, upheaval, the price per paper clip. We pick that rabbit out of the hat while everybody sits out there wondering how the hell we did it. Now you’re not naive enough to think we’re living in a democracy, are you buddy? It’s the free market. And you’re a part of it.”
Here, everyone drives a car where they’re going and they play in their own backyards. I discovered parks empty during the day. I can walk the three-quarters of a mile to Trader Joes and back again and see only a few Latina grandmothers with a grocery bag, but usually No One. My apartment complex is largely quiet. I spend my day with Diane Rehm and Kojo Nnamdi, and even talk out loud along with their radio show guests about the topics being discussed. Oh NPR – friend of lonely mothers everywhere! Zach’s arrival home for lunch, and later, home from work in the evening, are the social highlights of my day. That’s a bit of a burden on one man who is tired from his day of work and usually still has other jobs that need doing before he can get his downtime – his rest from the stimulation of being out with people all day long. I remember what that’s like.
Once the pumpkin was cool enough to handle, I peeled it (much easier to peel after cooking!) and cut it into one inch chunks. (Don't puree or mash it, apparently the USDA or FDA or somebody has deemed pureed pumpkin unsafe to can, the denseness of the puree supposedly makes it difficult to heat thoroughly enough for the home canner to safely can it... personally I have my doubts about this, but I was a good girl and followed the safety "rules"... this time)
There is no greater evil for a commander in chief.
No I don’t want a magazine deal,
Winner : Summer Wine Brewery - Never short of an opinion or two, or a Kevin or 6.
He is setting himself up as a hostage to fortune, the price of his statement on delivering that will be high.
See? So even if my week went crappers at least my skin was looking pretty fabulous for what I’ve got…haha
I could use a hug right about now…
Now for the beans. Grab the tin from your food stash and pour into pan. Easy eh? Well it would be if you have a ring pull bean can. You will have to use the bookstand again whilst you feel your way around the tin opener.
Still, all we have is words, not actions and a threat to curb the actions at that from part of the coagulation.
c.Flash
“They do,” says the Cat Lady, gently reprimanding a grumpy tabby with a half-hearted tap on the nose. “I put triple bells on the hunters, but they still catch them sometimes.”
Because I'd already read three books this year I'm now ahead of schedule with regard my target, which is slightly worrying. There is nothing more likely to scupper target reaching than complacency, and nothing more likely to instill complacency than being ahead. Whenever I feel I can do something I relax, often to such a degree that I fail to accomplish it. So we'll see. I have a book a friend lent me that I haven't got round to reading yet, the pressure to return it to her is building up, so I'll start that tonight.
Reduce the speed of the mixer and gradually beat in the butter, small chunks at a time, until incorporated. Then beat in the vanilla.
2-Link to one of my posts that I personally think best fits the following categories:
Stepney also explains the dynamic behaviour of the car, and the advantages the flexing floor gives: ‘From around 160-180km/h (100-112mph) the car is about 7-8mm lower at the leading edge of the floor, which multiplies up to nearly 19-20mm lower front wing height. The benefits in terms of ground effects and efficiency would be gained all around, with components like turning vanes and front wings at a reduced height relative to the ground.’ “
This verse has become my prayer this Christmas season – that I would make the time to give priority to rejoicing, being glad in God’s presence, and letting my inner joy show for those who may be silently desperate to know the giver of true joy.
I don’t believe in Hell. And I don’t like people assuming that I will end up there if I don’t believe in the ‘right’ god.
Somewhere around 2004/2005 the PNM reversed legislation that made it mandatory for anyone operating a quarry to require permission from the EMA. In the new legislation anyone operating a quarry under 150 acres can do so without permission from the EMA. The PNM issued this legislation to allow for the mining of aggregate to assist in the construction industry boom that was going on then.
Kirn opens with Bingham proclaiming, “To know me you have to fly with me.” By the end of the novel we know Bingham better than any one else. He has shared his deepest secrets with me. And I sympathize.
"Well, another month has come and gone, almost another year as well. So something a little different this month. I'm sure most of you know of and have probably seen "The Bucket List". Well, as I was getting ready to retire, I bought a book called "1,000 Places to see in Your Life". I read through it and marked all of the ones I've already seen. Of the 1,000 I had seen an amazing 78 of them. Doing a little math, I calculated that at the current rate (78 in 69 years) I was going to have to hurry up or live another 800+ years. I have concluded neither would I live that long nor would I see all 1000! I've even slowed down, only adding two in the last three years.
An Occupy activist missed the irony in his own dress sense during Tuesday’s May Day protest by attacking a Nike store wearing a pair of the brand’s sneakers.
Anitas large paper rosebuds in pink
enchanted creatures
A lively curiosity to know what other people have got.
If you have never had matzo balls, you are really missing something. They are very popular on the east coast in a bowl of chicken soup. Kids of all ages love them, and they are really easy to make.
Daily Challenges
When I read this, this morning, I knew it was me.
Right before Relief Society she came up to me with a piano book with my name written on it in the upper right hand corner. She explained to me that she had had the book for years (probably 8 to 10 years) and had felt bad that she had one of my books and wasn't able to return it because her family had moved.
The dinners hop happily into the oven after assembling themselves, and I'm fortunate to have a self-cleaning kitchen.
Breweries:
In the first part of this article, which I posted to the main blog, I listed the main arguments made by those who I term “The Believers”, when dismissing the claim that US President Barrack Obama has so far failed to prove that he is eligible to be president in terms of the requirement set out in the US Constitution, namely that he is “a natural born American”.
I was intending to visit 21st Amendment, a brewpub in SoMA not far from the ballpark. Local intelligence had warned me away, a new brewer of 6 months seemingly not having got to grips with the house beers so that it was a bit of a crapshoot drinking them. Instead, I headed for the Thirsty Bear on Howard St (between 2nd & 3rd) near SF MOMA.
Tonight was my Target night. I try to do that about once every 2 weeks...get out of the house for the purpose of being non-mommy, non-wife, non-employee and just be good ole me. Usually this results in exciting purchases like toilet paper, toothpicks, or greeting cards. But tonight--tonight was a good Target night. I found some cute pants & an adorable top for work. And these really amazing earrings that go with like a hundred shirts I have (did I mention they were amazing?).
Saturday I woke up bright and early and headed to the east valley to go garage saling with my mother-in-law and my friend Meghan! We hit up the fabric store too, which is my little slice of heaven lately! Always a project or 12 I have in mind to work on!
twelve bars that may
Evening clouds piling up to peaks of the forgotten
Towards the end of my circus career I had grown into a big and powerful ape. My human friends came to me with their problems and disputes as if I were a cross between Don Corleone and King Kong. One such incident occurred when we were performing in Essex. It was the summer, and the circus had hired a pair of school leavers on some kind of government training programme. These two lads, called Callum and Travis, were not the best bred examples of English youth, and had a habit of leering at the female acrobats. One of these young women complained to me about them:
However, whenever they occupied themselves with either of those options
We ambled down through the furniture of art, the black and white photo exhibit and the pop art section. All the while I explained each classification and watched her nose turn up in confusion. She has great facial expression when it comes to new things.
The Filth and the Fury ends with the same abrupt conclusion of is subject, with only a brief coda spared for Sid Vicious' rapid downfall and his wrenching, pathetic demise a year after the Pistols disbanded. Much as Lydon rages in his silhouette throughout the film against McLaren, his bandmates and the fans who ruined what he wanted to be an individual manifesto, it's Sid's downfall that brings out the most acidic venom in the frontman. Filled with loathing for everyone and himself, Lydon mourns his poor fool of a friend and the greedy forces that destroyed him. It only furthers Sid's image as the emblem of punk, but when Lydon loses his composure talking about him, Vicious turns back into the kid who never made it to 22. Lydon will never truly have his friend back, neither literally nor in the sense that Sid now belongs to the movement that killed him, but for one brief moment, even this burned-out immortal is made just an ordinary human being again. But then, that's what ultimately made him a god in the first place.
The Vice Chairman of the CFR is Richard E. Salomon, a senior advisor to the Jesuit cohort David Rockefeller (Who you tell me is SMOM). He is Chairman of the Advisory Board of Blackstone Group. Blackstone Group is run by Peter G. Peterson and Stephen A. Schwarzman. Peterson is married to Joan Cooney, who has received honorary degrees from two Jesuit institutions (Boston College and Georgetown University) and whose mother was Catholic. Peterson co-founded the Concord Coalition along with Warren Rudman, who was Jesuit-trained at Boston College. Peterson was also a crony of Jesuit-trained Bill Clinton. As for Stephen Schwarzman, Schwarzman was a member of Skull & Bones (Which is really the Vatican’s Papal Knights of Eulogia) and he celebrated his 60th birthday on February 13, 2007. One of his friends who attended the party was Cardinal Edward Egan. So, we can see that both of the men running the Blackstone Group, which Saloman had close ties to, are Jesuit coadjutors.
True, I could pick up an oldie of hers…but I have to say, this author has gotten better with time. Her latest two books were grand slams for me, while reaching back into her older titles I sometimes feel like something is missing. Like settling for Burger King instead of Mickey-D’s (hmm…craving much? Note: I’m writing this around lunch-time…please forgive the fast food references, lol)
The federal push to standardize regulation can have a profound effect on insurance producers, forcing them to become financial advisors. Eric Thomes, chairman of the National Association for Fixed Annuities (NAFA), said that it will not serve the business or clients well.
“The U.S. population has almost doubled since 1954, and trends such as urban sprawl and conversion of rural land to suburban landscapes increase the likelihood a tornado will impact densely populated areas,” he said. “We have also become more vulnerable to coastal storms and hurricanes as more people are living in coastal areas.”
But it didn't matter...because by the time the jump judge stopped me a few jumps later, I had already stopped so hard at the first water that I nearly went off the front of my horse.
Today the issue is whether suction-dredge mining harms the fish and the water quality of the rivers. Nineteenth century miners didn’t worry about the Fish and Game Department or the Environmental Protection Agency. But writings from the period make it clear how much their mining changed the hillsides and rivers where gold was found.
I have been grilling them under the broiler and they are amazing and sooooo low calorie! They are tiger prawns and I get mine frozen at Costco in a huge bag....so delish!
Although not always my favorite, I do really like this quick clip on tithing from Mark Driscoll at Mars Hill Church in Seattle. I think he nails it with God's desire for our giving.
Compared to those without pets, it turns out pet owners from the same community sample tend to be higher in self-esteem and report they are in better physical shape and exercise more frequently (but it should be noted there were no differences in depression or happiness between these groups). In terms of personality, pet owners are more responsible and outgoing and less anxious about their relationships. But interestingly, pet owners also report being more dismissive of human relationships and independent than their counterparts without pets.
Don't forget to check out all the gorgeous work from the design team and give a big welcome our December Guest Desginer Squirrel who has made a fabulous creation for you this week, welcome hun and so pleased to have you join us this month.
Am I the only one who suffers from the affliction of needing to be well liked?
Speaking of Armageddon and the lack of cleaning that seems to take place with a newborn… a friend suggested this little gem to me for helping with the endless sterilizing of pacifiers, bottles, breast pump equipment, etc. I have used it at least a million times already in only 10 weeks and I LOVE IT.
We do a small 2 course meal consisting of Quick Creamed Mushroom Soup (we use the cheat recipe that makes use of canned cream of mushroom soup), Golden Fish Baked in Cream, Multi- grained loaf of bread, and Placki (potato pancakes). The potato pancakes (to my knowledge) are not traditional Christmas Eve fair but hubby really likes them and since you can top them with sour cream and the fish recipe calls for sour cream too, I figure why not?
Remove and serve on a individual platter.
This is clunky writing of the worst sort. It's a series of statements, not a paragraph. There is no cadence here; the sentences don't flow readily.
I also needed all of my discipline to restrict my grazing. There was so much good food I could have easily eaten all day with no regard. My large breakfast helped me here. I wasn’t hungry and I didn’t really eat much. I did enjoy some of the gumbo and finger foods, but I didn’t eat nearly as much as I had in years past. Again, I was lucky. Many of the foods that would trigger a feeding frenzy in me just weren’t there.
The method of cooking is different as there is no whistling in the kitchen with the Futura cooker plus cooking is faster. You can make this in ordinary cooker and remove after 2 whistles also use 1 ½ cup of water for every cup of rice. Allow the pressure to fall naturally.
We have a winner! Tonight dinner my husband declared this as his favorite French Friday meal so far.
We have had the strangest Winter/Spring here in California.
The ignorance behind these killings is obvious. The Bonneville Dam is the main problem, it kills up to 75% of salmon and creates an unnatural blockade on an otherwise free-flowing river. Couple that with habitat destruction, upstream hatcheries and overfishing by humans and you can easily see why the salmon are disappearing. But like a broken record, the National Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS) only wants to discuss their favorite scapegoat, the sea lions. They believe that they only have 3 options; capture wild sea lions and send them to Sea World, chemically euthanize them, or put a bullet in their head.
This is the all-important issue that is being hotly disputed by science. Scientists, and most particularly medical scientists including neuroscientists, are trying to put across the idea that the mind and consciousness are created by the brain and/or the brain’s activity. If the mind is created by the brain then there is no common platform, and if there is not common mental aspect to our reality then there is no interpersonal environment. Scientists are claiming that the interpersonal only means people being in the physical presence of each other. Thus if a person has not been approached, they cannot have been attacked. This is carried to great length by psychiatrists. If someone does or says something to anger you for instance, then it is deemed “it’s your fault for getting angry”. You just don’t have control of over yourself and your emotions! This is rubbish. Unfortunately they want to uphold the Dr Spock of the science fiction movies, who has no emotion and is totally rational as the idea man/human. And make no mistake they know full well that the narcissist or psychopaths in society keep a straight face, claiming no anger but use underhanded mob tactics to “get back at” the other person so as to generate medical problems and even death. Anger in non-toxic people is aroused by a violation and more generally by some form of injustice. If we didn’t normally get angry then we would not bother to work towards or care about having a just society to live in. What we do to address the problem is certainly important. However no matter if you “act out” in some way or not, even if you hold a straight face and count to ten or whatever you do to make you appear calm, there is still modification of your body function. While ever you are angry there are changes in the way the body functions. While you are angry, whether continually or episodically, there are adverse processes and events taking place in your body and sometimes these may have catastrophic effects immediately if the anger is aroused suddenly and intensely as can be done if there are long standing conditions and repeated violations. All emotions are significant modifications to body function and in all cases the person does not have to be approached by the offenders for issues to be presented to them as to cause them to have an emotional response, which is significant modification of body function and most particularly the heart.
But the Redemption we work with here, is a little different from that.
So we call is “business”, “reparation” take your pick,
Why would all of their books, their structures and information sets end with the December 21st, 2012 date? Because we will not need their guidance any longer. Humanity will lead their own way from deep within their heart. The end times is really the full birth of empowered, conscious times on earth! All the planets, all the stars, suns, and family in all the multi-verses is pushing and pulling on every strand of DNA to make sure it works out exactly that way!
My father told me not long before he died, he had relatives in Poland who were writing to his family until 1940. Read the Jonathan Kaufman book Hole in The Heart of the World to learn more about the Jewish communities that survived after World War II and the Holocaust. I’ve visited Auschwitz, (mandatory to learn about the worst in people), the main synagogue in Krakow and where the Warsaw Ghetto was.
smoke for about 25 minutes,checking after 22 minutes for doneness
12:18 SH walks to the major road to summon a taxi. In the pouring rain.
i'm making this quick post because:
Those changes will come, but they have not quite reached you yet.
a) Dr. Kailash Joshi, Chairman & Mentor, ex-IBM
When Steve talks about work, it's like listening to a foreign language to me and I know I don't listen the way I should. So, I'm going to start looking at him and really trying to understand what he's saying.
In general, this trip has been awesome. I pat myself on the back for bringing warm clothing – hat, scarf, gloves. It was freezing – generally, 39-40 F. After battling the elements every day, I learned to keep my raincoat and gloves in my backpack.
Now here’s where you come in: First, I would really love your feedback because it gives me a good idea of how to improve the videos, so you can enjoy them more. And I would love to hear how your nut milk turned out! What nut did you use, did you add any flavours, was it easy, tasty?! Leave your comments below.
2. wide plank fir flooring
-the above category with minimum $2,000 in debt for 1+ years
Protein: 2
As always Just Tracys will be giving a voucher to our winner
It was during this time in Scotland that Paul and Linda McCartney began to form the idea of putting together a new band. I don’t know how, but somehow Paul McCartney persuaded his wife, who had no musical training at all, to form a band with him. I can’t imagine the amount of courage it would’ve taken to get on stage for the first time with her very famous husband. While it took a few years to get things right, the band the two ultimately formed, Wings, went on to be hugely successful during its ten year run, 1971-1981. That band deserves a series of posts in and of itself.
Working out fine so far, on average.
Well, thank you, life. You certainly do keep me on my toes!…or crying in the fetal position with a cup of tea and Monty Python songs…(P.S. I’m not really crying right now, though tears have been shed in regards to the murdered perfect plan of my future.)
Deschutes Brewery Bend 19th Anniversary Golden Ale Belgium Style StrongGolden Ale Full Sail Brewing Co Hood River Full Sail LTD 02 Pale Bock
You can buy Global Game Jam: 48 Hours of Persistence, Programming and Pizza exclusively from Amazon.co.uk and the international family of Amazon sites, and if you already have it you can leave a review for it. Buy it in paperback here, and on Kindle here.
I'm always on the lookout for custom rug options. I bookmarked Custom Cool a while back after seeing their store featured in a fall issue of Elle Decor, but for whatever reason I didn't delve into their site until recently. After hundreds of clicks, I'm now very well acquainted with their creations and I couldn't be more excited about this new resource.
Lainey :)
Dressing, recipe below
My washing machine broke.
When the weather improves and I have a little more time, a return trip to Zion National Park will definitely be on my “to do” list. The rock formations and brilliant shades of red are truly amazing. After returning from this trip, I looked up the meaning and history of the word, Zion. Originally it was simply the name of a specific mountain near Jerusalem, Mount Zion, but subsequently it was used as a Biblical metonym for Solomon’s temple in Jerusalem, the city of Jerusalem, and for the world to come in God’s Kingdom. Isaiah 28:16 states, Therefore thus says the Lord God: “Behold, I lay in Zion a stone for a foundation, A tried stone, a precious cornerstone, a sure foundation; Whoever believes will not act hastily.” This foundation refers to God’s promises as manifest in His written word and in His son, Christ Jesus. He is a foundation of God’s laying; a tried stone, a trying stone, a touch-stone, that shall distinguish between true and counterfeit (Matthew Henry Unabridged).
These subsidies also harms the environment that leftists are always claiming to be the champions of. This happens in a number of ways; countries with high levels of public ownership of property have higher levels of pollution, see the Soviets and Communist China’s record on pollution if you don’t believe this or the classic example – public toilets versus a hotel bathroom. If you own something you take care of it, if everyone owns it you don’t. The environment is also harmed by the loss of efficiency, economic growth depends on a number of things, leftists are correct in claiming that an increase in inputs is part of economic growth and has negative environmental consequences but they seem to take no notice of how their love of subsidies, regulation and government ownership of business negatively effects efficiency. This efficiency cost causes serious environmental damage, quite simply because while the inputs are the same (products of mining or farming and labour, etc) the outputs are reduced, requiring more inputs to meet the same quota.
Give ear, O my people, to my law: incline your ears to the words of my mouth. I will open my mouth in a parable: I will utter dark sayings of old: Which we have heard and known, and our fathers have told us. We will not hide them from their children, shewing to the generation to come the praises of the LORD, and his strength, and his wonderful works that he hath done.
In 1946, Duke left the United States for France, where he continued his double career of being a classical composer and a songwriter (now setting to music the texts of French lyricists). By 1948, the composer was back in America. He moved from New York to California where he spent his last decades, writing songs, film and theater scores, chamber music, poetry in Russian and polemical articles and memoirs in English. On October 30, 1957, he married singer Kay McCracken, who had studied with Lotte Lehmann (and who into the 21st century was still performing as Kay Duke Ingalls). His final appearance on Broadway came less than two weeks later with the two songs and incidental music he wrote for the Helen Hayes show, Jean Anouilh‘s Time Remembered (1940) (French title: Léocadia) which ran for 247 performances. He continued to try to mount Broadway musicals during the last decade of his life, including two shows that closed during tryouts and one that went unproduced.
Sewing machines are a lot like cars. How we feel about them is entirely subjective. Regardless of the official product description or what online reviewers may say, if we like it, we like it and if we don't, we don't.
tan skin
so here is my list of loves.
1 stalk celery, chopped
Until the next time, live long and prosper
BECAUSE IT WAS AWESOME.
U.S. editorial denounced for distorting events
– New Supreme Court Term Heavy On Criminal Justice Issues
What do you do with that?
The Hare Krsnas entered the pop culture not only through the hippie/rock backdoor, they also walked in the front door of straight-up America. Numerous Americana compilations like the following have included Krsna Conscious relics.
Then, something happened that has never happened before.
A Review by Lin Sten of Patricia A. Leslie's novel, The Ballad of Young Tam Lin
2 contribute
So when I heard there was a special display of James Bond vehicles marking the 50th year of ‘Bond in Motion’, I felt sure there should at least be something to look at to hold off the “can we go now” mantra that all children perfect from an early age.
Jonas is also a betrayer. He was not unfaithful to Anna, no, he betrayed his mother. He was thirteen years when it started:
7. Priest (2011) – This is definitely post apocalyptic, but it could be another world. Does that mean it doesn’t count? It still counts on my list. The world has been ravaged by a war between humans and vampires. The humans won by employing Priests, a team of church trained commandos, and vampires are confined to reservations. Now, the vampires are tired of reservation life and are on the rampage. They attack a homestead and kidnap the niece of a war veteran. He, along with a sidekick, go on an epic journey to save his niece (which is really his daughter) and put the vampires back in their place.
Today Jack and I spent a lot of time in bed being cute before our dear friends from Santa Cruz came to visit us! We then cleaned the kitchen a little after taking showers, after which we went and had dinner! Our out-of-town-friends (Darlene & Jacob) came as we were almost done so we gave them food! Then went to Jamba Juice for dessert because Darlene didn’t know the name of the drink I always get from there (It’s called a White Gummy Bear, you can order it even though it’s not on the menu)!
Thus, due to the NBA rule that states: “Any player or coach guilty of intentional physical contact with an official shall automatically be suspended without pay for one game. A fine and/or longer period of suspension will result if circumstances so dictate,” the Celtics will take the court without their starting point guard.
“Unlike most real markets,” wrote Henningsen, “the carbon market was created by banks and governments so that new investment opportunities could seamlessly dovetail with specific government policies. It’s a fantasy casino based on a doctrine of pure science fiction.”
It’s okay to be a crackpot. It’s okay to have flaws and that’s a good thing because we all have them! Every single person does. Thankfully, our Master doesn’t throw away broken pots. You may never see the flowers that grow up along the path behind you where water has leaked through the cracks of your weaknesses and mistakes. You may never know the extent to which God brings good from your life, but be assured that He does bring good out of each day and moment of your life no matter what if you believe in Him, love Him, and live life surrendered to Him.
Here are some fun photos of our mini adventure.
“We know that sometimes it is difficult to make care decisions when you don’t have specific experience with an agency. It was our goal to provide families with the ability to make an informed decision, have tangible ways to measure quality and help them find a comfort level when choosing an agency to work with,” commented Aaron Marcum, founder of Home Care Pulse.
IAAF spokesman Nick Davies was not immediately available to comment on the story.
More than I can tell you
On Wednesday around lunch, my mom and Palyn made it in from Foley, followed by Shane from Prattville. Our festivities were only getting started! We all went to Shane's mom, Gale's house for Thanksgiving dinner. We were also joined by his sister and her kids, and Gale's boyfriend﻿, Dale. This was everyone's first time to meet other than me, Gale, and Dale. We had a wonderful dinner, I really need Gale to teach me how to cook like her! After dinner, we picked out a few Christmas baby pictures of Shane to put out at our holiday shower. We also showed Gale and Heather the wedding inspirations that I have printed out and kept in a binder.
Secondly, the newco plays as Rangers whilst a CVA is organised for oldco.
End of conversation.
Please consider adopting your next pet, already spayed or neutered, from a rescue organization. In addition, to your local animal control affiliates, there are also breed specific rescue groups.
I pray Numbers 6:24-26 for you.
For those of you that know me, know that I've ALWAYS wanted to be a mom. I use to carry around my babies pretending they were real. It was rare to see me without one of them attached to my hip. So needless to say when Matthew and I found out we were pregnant, I was on top of the world!! My dream was coming true, I was finally going to be a mommy!!
When I walk through the door.
to ensure our application doesn't get lost in spam.
‘Well it was the time I lived through and one of the finest times of my life, not a care in the world. It was a significant time for Africa and I believe the British experience in Africa was a benevolent one; I think when they pulled out of Africa they left it in a finer place than they found it. I am nostalgic about the past and about the Africa I knew, that has changed or gone completely.
My children did choose some things to give up for Lent, but I have also tried to stress that "doing" something is just as important during this penitential season. For example, we have tried to attend the Stations of the Cross devotions at our church each Friday. We are doing the extra kind sacrifices and saying extra kind things and reading books that have us focusing on the true meaning of the season and bringing us closer to God and His Word.
Possibly McDonald’s.
YAY!!
I told him they are “famous personalities” and can be found easily. He said give them a chance to come forward or else he would invoke Section 111 of the criminals procedure code to compel them to come forward.
Sometimes it was a riot of pattern and colour - like these super sassy garden stools from Two's Company. It actually became quite humorous - nearly everyone that I ran into would mention that they had seen these - and would exclaim "Have you seen those garden stools?!?!?!?!? You were the first person I thought of when I saw them."
The class: The biggest detractor for me was the fluorescent lighting. I’ve very sensitive to fluorescent lights and have gotten quite attached to the mood lighting that’s popular in the yoga studios that I’ve frequented in the States.
koguma-chan = small bear
Maybe you like to color those cute little kid images. Then you might want to focus more on skin tones, and brighter colors for clothing in the more saturated lower color families. If you like vintage images, you might want to consider the less saturated colors in the higher color families, for a more faded look on your images.
Lv 48 – Excadrill (Bread and Butter – X scissor killed most of the elite 4)
Bhagavad Gita stands for poise and equanimity and for performing one’s designated duty. Lord Krishna does not encourage everyone to take the weapons and fight but a soldier cannot sell bananas in the market. He has to take his weapon to bring security to his people.
Pattern Sizing: 6-14, I made my usual 14 and it fits fine.
1 tirelessly
Oh girl, you love to eat and you are a fast eater! You are still a breastfed-only baby and rarely take a bottle (which your Mommy and Daddy both still prefer since you are happiest with nursing). During the day you go everywhere from 2 to 3 hours between feedings...but mainly 2. During the night you usually have a late-night feeding you wake up for around 11, you then wake up again around 4 or 5, and then again around 8 or 8:30. (This is textbook to what the doctor told us to expect from you at this stage.) You still eat for a whopping 10 minutes at most (15-20 on the rarest occasions). Your spitting up (that was pretty minimal) has gone to almost never. You also have started burping really well and show much less signs of uncomfortable gas these days.
Miss Alexander is one of those race-hustlers à la Louis Gates that the Times just loves loves loves.
works out in the long run.
Few recent trends exhibit pop music's ongoing campaign of self-cannibalization more distinctly than the cottage industry of ironic cover bands. The concept is sound: Take a well-worn tract like Dark Side of the Moon or OK Computer (pound it, Easy Star All-Stars) and run it through the pedalboard of multiculturalism, so that the end result maintains a level of familiarity while offering enough novelty to appeal to both classic rock fans and jaded hipster intelligentsia. The Vitamin Records label has met with considerable success in recent years by offering string quartet tributes to artists that bridge the gap between mainstream and underground, including Nirvana, Radiohead, Tool, and the Pixies; Rockabye Baby! Records has carved out a similar niche with artist-specific albums of lullaby covers. Elsewhere on the map lie novelty bands of the Hayseed Dixie and Dread Zeppelin variety, with Christopher O'Riley's solo piano explorations taking up residence somewhere in the vicinity of the Gary Jules cover of "Mad World". One of the more unique musicians to have joined the fray is Petra Haden, whose brilliantly arranged solo a cappella renditions of such chestnuts as "God Only Knows" and "Don't Stop Believin'" (along with an extraordinary reimagining of The Who Sell Out) have provided a timeless twist on songs that by all rights should have been clobbered to death by mainstream radio a long time ago.
And the fact that they were at the front door and not tending to his bedside helped too.
I was looking forward to taking a shower upon returning home. Cold showers after a sweaty adventure outside is one of the things about summer that I enjoy. Sure…it’s just a shower to get clean, but it is such a great feeling! Especially drenching your head in cold water. The cold shower felt so good after my run, it inspired me to write about it…ha!
Vaux, who is best known for partnering with Frederick Law Olmsted to design such iconic green spaces as Central Park and Prospect Park, was 70 years old and employed as the landscape architect for the New York Parks Department when he left his son’s house in Bensonhurst for an early morning walk on Nov. 19, 1895, and never returned.
Mhaga said it was commendable that cases could be dealt with so speedily. “If someone is caught red-handed for shoplifting, and if he pleads guilty, and if he has an attorney available, then the case can be finalised in an hour.”
As a survivor of child sexual abuse, to me, this was powerful stuff. Typically when stories like this reach the media, controversy and debate ensue giving more voice to the alleged perpetrators in order to maintain the façade that powerful institutions are impermeable to such horrific accusations. Movement is usually swift in protecting the establishment’s reputation. Cover up is priority. Excuses are mandatory. But this was not the case with the story in the hands Dan Patrick.
Chicken thigh, as much as you’d like, minced
The following are some benefits of tea freshly brewed from fresh peppermint and spearmint leaves with honey.
"Sure did", Says Christine. "Was walking down the path and I saw you go straight in!"
"...all my achievements meant nothing in God's economy. No, the real legacy of my life was my biggest failure -- that I was an ex-convict. My greatest humiliation -- being sent to prison -- was the beginning of God's greatest use of my life ... only when I lost everything I thought made Chuck Colson a great guy had I found the true self God intended me to be and the true purpose of my life. It is not what we do that matters, but what a sovereign God chooses to do through us. God doesn't want our success; He wants us. He doesn't demand our achievements; He demands our obedience..."
Chocolates are a great source of quick energy.
“At first we tried to sidestep the blog label, calling it a ‘blog site,’ or ‘my website, which is a blog...about art...it’s not like a typical blog that’s really boring and just about my personal life and how trifling Wicker Park is,’” chuckled Wenzel. As we discussed his accomplishments and plans for the future at his spacious and elegant Bucktown headquarters. No, “urban and sophisticated Bucktown villa.”
Planning stage: This will be the one novel where I actually stick to my pre-planned plot. I've definitely got it all spot on this time. It's going to be easy!
One Hot Pleasure (Ralphi Rosario Dub) Electronica 129 bpm 7:57
Good morning and welcome to another challenge here on Paperplay Challenges.
3. Words. Whether written, spoken, or sung, words have more power to move me than any other medium. And writing my own words gives me purpose and peace.
So I just sat there reading my science fiction stories, trying to dry out. The rest of the gang came back a bit later totally soaked. I don’t know how these guys can sustain this and not get sick. Perhaps their immune system is tuned differently. However, after a while I had to come out and eat. At least it wasn’t raining as hard. I called the airline. We had to make sure that they have time to pick us up from circle lake. We may want to come out, but if they don’t have planes available then we would have to just sit and wait. They did have planes. The problem was that the circle lake wasn’t big enough for a float plane to take off with 4 people. As a result, they would have to shuttle us by 2 to Takahula and then take off from there. Oh, well. This actually presented a problem – what if the weather changes and half of the group would be in one spot and half in another?
I'm counting down the days till the Handmade by Suzanne scrapbooking retreat - there are still a few spots available, so if you would love a fun, scrappin' weekend away, check here for details.
Why does Snickers have an ad that says, "You aren't you when you are hungry", great time to have that ad campaign, Where was this sort of thinking when I was a kid, PLUS its a goddamn fad that everyone knows will just fade away. If certain people are so smart, and the United States is apparently "Politically Correct", then WHY dont people realize that you are not you when you are hungry, why the hell does that have to be an ad slogan. ITS TRUE! Yet that fact is used as a fly-by-night ad slogan? That just gives NO credibility to that fact. Maybe the reason people are not sympathetic to most folks who are not in wheelchairs or have a serious medical problem is that they can see the issue. Things that people see are not infused with daily thoughts that one should focus on, but that would be telling people what to do wouldnt it, why is America afraid to give people a certain sense of morality. I guess thats what church is for, but what about the people that don't go to church, how would they get morality...I guess they can't.
NOTE: THEY HAVE UPDATED POCKET GOD FOR ANDROID…BUT IT IS STILL BEHIND APPLE’S UPDATES
* Edited in: In the few days since I wrote this post, Michael Stewart's Not-the-Booker-winning King Crow has become available on Kindle. I've also read it since, and recommend it - vivid and moving (and very cleverly written).
If you work on a fast food account, you get asked to work on other fast food accounts. Same for cars. Same for airlines. Same for most categories. Like any profession (stops and laughs hysterically for using the word "profession"....okay, regaining composure...), leveraging your experience is what keeps you employed.
The Road to Christmas (Not for Children)... LMN ... 10 PM
“O Israel, I will bear witness against you; *
First, the adorable little “kid” Joey Lagano, trying to fill Tony Stewart’s shoes but not doing too bad, of course until he wrecked..that’s okay kid, wasn’t your fault..for a young’un he’s not a bad driver..not bad at all..so look out vets!
However, the thing I am really excited about is that Tony's first-ever novel is coming from Walker. Viking Boy (which I haven't yet managed to get my hands on) will appear in September, and from the description it sounds like a feast of non-stop adventure, (and I can't wait to meet the mythical flying wolves). This will definitely be one to look out for.
I was in awe listening to the faith and perseverance of Abera. What a fantastic believer. What a fantastic man. Then he gave some advice for those who evangelize and plant churches. He said, “First you suffer, then you win. That is the way that it happens.” Many of the people who beat him became Christians now and not only that, some are even evangelists going and taking the gospel to others.
Eight people, including six students of Shanghai Jiaotong University, a tour guide and a boat driver, were aboard when the accident happened at around 1 pm in Taihu lake in the city of Suzhou, the municipal maritime officials said.
Here's a very interesting story about what's happening in this struggle between farmers and the Big Giant bully. It gives an update on how organic farmers are combining resources to try to preserve their rights to grow organic food, without the fear of Monsanto trying to squash their operations. The link I'm guiding you to is Wood Prairie Farm's website, where I buy my seed potatoes each year. They're a nice family with an admirable organic farm in Maine. Their newsletter on the website is worth reading.
4. Blogging – Please do take a look at the Brilliance in Blogging Awards shortlist over on Britmums. I found it lovely to discover blogs that I did not know about. We can all learn from and with each other.
Level 1: MP Cost: 20, Damage: 194%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 3 times, 1% chance to stun the enemy for 1 seconds.
Both Aloe Vera and Okara fresh herbal tea are sold in all over South American countries.
and Dinner Date with our teacher Dasuri is next! ^^
and the paper claimed he committed suicide
The rabbit made it to the side of the garage and zipped into the habitat James made for the rabbits. The hawk stopped short of hitting the side of the garage, flapped his wings to change course, and turned around mid air and flew to the clothesline pole, a few feet from the habitat. Can you see the hawk:? I took this picture through the window. The window was open so it was two glass windows. Darn. Not a sharp picture. The hawk waited awhile, then flew to the nearby tree.
(Lights open. Anwaar is alone lying on the floor. She is dead. Servants enter and they go to Anwaar. They are crying. Narrator enters.)
I'm hoping that a fresh space will give me the courage I need to do the new things I'd like to do with my writing. I'd love to see you there.
Well, now isn’t that interesting.
A lot of people are good at "being" writers, but they can't write very well at all. I know that's a snobby thing to say, but I also believe it is true.
Bottom line, sometimes our dreams don’t turn out as we hoped, but that doesn’t mean we need to give up. With a little adjustment here and there, we can still hit the ground running. Or walking. Or cycling. Or crawling.
HR objecting: That’s rather vague and abstract it’s not really
Bounty Basic Towels 6 ct+ $1/1
There were/are times when I want to wake up from the nightmare of having preemies (mostly micro preemies), but know that it is our reality...our life. A different life than what most would want. A life that has taught me that money isn't everything...family and friends are...the people that you meet in your lifetime are. Decorating your child's cemetery plot and praying that the extra plot next to him won't ever have to be used is. The experiences, good and bad are important. Watching your child who was so small play a sport, sing a song or try to tell you what he wants when he can't talk is. Doing things for others are. Understanding and forgiving is and so are A hug, a deep stare and an I love you!
In Case C-495/09, Her Majesty's Commissioners of Revenue and Customs (HMRC) inspected at London Heathrow Airport a consignment of mobile phones and accessories, coming from Hong Kong and destined for Colombia, with a sign identical to the Community trade mark registered by Nokia. Suspecting that the goods were fake, HMRC informed Nokia but, when Nokia asked for the seizure of the consignment, HMRC denied the request stating that, in the absence of evidence of diversion into the EU, the goods could not be considered counterfeit, according to case Montex. Consequently, Nokia brought an action against HMRC before the High Court of Justice of England and Wales.
This romance adult ebook video synopsis post, is presented by Laura Meets Jeffrey, a brand new adult romance ebook featuring the love and romance during the ’1970s and early ’1980s. Laura Meets Jeffrey .
The me before I started to cook, followed by the me in culinary school, which led to the me as line cook....every step of the way there was change. Becoming a sous chef only accelerated things. And changing kitchens? Forget about it. Sometimes I think about all the people I used to know, and all things I used to do. It's foreign. There is little to no nostalgia involved. My only memories are what feel like someone elses war story. So where are you now? Who do you know from your past life? How has cooking changed you?
I can't wait to start these crochet projects. Oh, and if you're thinking I can read Japanese - um, no i can't - but fear not, there are diagrams of the stitches and how to finish each project in the back of the book.
that, and only when you understand that, will the current erosion of
And so the Board affirmed this refusal as well.
not even to smoke....
Have you bought yourself a PlayStation Vita? Tell us about your experiences in the comments
Karl Edward Wagner – The Slug
Card Size 5 1/2 x 4 1/4
From Austerlitz, I went on to read three more magnificent books by Sebald, The Emigrants (which was so highly praised by Susan Sontag), The Rings of Saturn, and After Nature, a book of long poems. I wanted to explore more post-war German literature after these works and I moved onto A Sorrow Beyond Dreams by Peter Handke and Thomas Bernard’s book of ultra-short stories, The Voice Imitator. I don’t know whether the beauty of Sebald’s books held me away from the brutal, sparseness of Handke and Bernard, but both books left me cold and hopeless. Handke’s world is without tenderness, heroes or redemption, and no one could escape the unrelenting knife of irony and dark comedy in Bernard. I will continue with Bernard, perhaps moving onto his book Loser. I think I’m finished with Handke.
When I have expressed my belief to conservative friends that everyone should earn a Living Wage, their response has been to ask why I want to seize the wealth of others. News for them: fair pay for honest work is not money seized from anyone; it is money honestly earned. If paying a Living Wage would, in fact, be the same as stealing, it could only prove that this money was extractive wealth that should have been theirs to begin with. Nor could it devalue those who are reasonably paid. Living Wage laws have worked well in Australia, where they have been in place for a century. A fair social setting hasn’t hurt the poor in European nations, where an illness never creates a family bankruptcy, as is frequent here, and the low-wage worker isn’t automatically poor when age forces retirement.
Calories that were not helping me to feel naturally full and thereby causing me to overeat.
7- Constitution: Obama shouldn't be allowed to mention the Constitution because he has done nothing but ignore it!
My big project last week was making up some jewellery bags for my market at the weekend. I posted a tutorial about them which you can find the link to at my post here if you're interested!
12. Soylent Green feat. Trials (prod. by Trials)
“It was a labor of love, because it was four part-time jobs that all were interconnected to each other around the game of soccer. That’s kind of how I piecemealed my livelihood together,” Holocher said.
poured out again back to the streets, prairies and
The following is an abridged version of this marvellous poem by D. W. Nash. Unfortunately it is far too long to publish in its entirety, and although it is beautifully written and evokes memories of a crisp autumnal morning, the first dozen or so paragraphs are not strictly relevant to British Nationalism. The rest of it certainly is, however.
If you are buying a home which you are planning to remodel, it is very important to find out exactly what will be deductible when you sell and how to get the proper receipts to prove these expenses.
- My wife says: Is the wife seeing visions of Rosie or is it someone else?
Lipton Tea Bags $2.50 -$0.60/2 Lipton Tea Bags, To Go, or Iced Tea Mix, (RP 07/31/11)
A few weeks ago, I had a life-changing conversation with two of my kids, which has resulted in a new direction for me: I'm going to build an off-grid house with my own hands (and my kids' hands, and whoever else wants to help).
The sands say you also wear Addidas;
Open adoption is truly something lovely. We love you dearly, Laurel, and we thank God for your love every single day!
Wait a minute! That is the same farm where I had stopped 4 hours ago and they said they hadn't seen them. What is going on? I drove over anyways, met Laura there, and once again the nice lady told us they hadn't seen anything. At which point our hearts sank. We had been so hopeful, so excited to at least have a small lead. But then, this time, the nice lady said, "Feel free to drive down the lane and check around if you'd like."
Two months later, another bill arrived to cover the £4,174 cost of other work to the kitchen, including fitting cupboards and tiles and redecorating the room. It brought the total expense of the Blairs' new kitchen to £10,674.
But more than that, I think it’s about living in such a temporary situation. I’ve had 10 addresses in 2 and 1/2 years in Brighton, preceded by 48 addresses in 3 years in Spain. Yes, I pay the rent, and the bills, and am a good tenant…so why? you may well ask. Why, indeed?! Not by choice, I assure you! I need to feel like I have a home. Cooking – self-nurturing through meal preparation – is my way of home-making.
Stunts: (7/10) – Lockout’s more physical action scenes contain some neat moments, but many of them feel like a victim of the budget, since they’re often solved very abruptly. There’s one really neat moment where Snow is sparring with an inmate in a gravity lift, but it’s finished so quickly that you’ll want to see more of what the filmmakers could have done with it. Consequently, the movie’s climax feels weak and unsatisfying, and it just leads into a denouement that contains a few decent twists, but feels like it’s neutered the excitement of the film. There’s still a few good physical scenes here and there, especially in the intro sequence that sets up Snow’s predicament, but at $20 million, you get what your movie pays for, if you know what I’m saying.
In fact, myth #7 is already busted before they have even started. I mean, just have a gander at this bollocks!
So the day finally arrived. I type this up from Cape Town. A very early start this morning. Getting up at 3:30 am is not what I am used to at all. But we made it and the flight was pleasant.
I very much agree with this one. People often write, and ask a long series of questions. They are doing it out of genuine interest, I'm sure. I really don't mind the questions, but I do reserve the right to decide how, what and when I'll reply to them.
Meanwhile, Liz finds her own escape. Her decisions create the uncertainty that she and Jimmy must deal with, if not solve, as the novel reaches its satisfying, open-ended conclusion. Liz watches in a doctor's office "the wee pulse of light, like a faraway star," and that symbolizes the possibilities that the author, in the voices of three convincingly related characters, creates to delve into the mysteries beneath the mundane working-class life in Glasgow that she, a native, invigorates with recognizable emotion and sympathetic compassion. (Posted to Amazon US & Lunch.com 3-6-11)
after the movie, Kristin and I went to dinner.
All of these frames were bought at thrift stores. Most were UGLY. Lots were gold (ick), some white, some brown. I spray painted them all in black!
Attached are a couple of pictures from the Texas Freethought Convention. I attended the convention but didn’t take either of these pics. They were taken by a member of our local Houston Atheist Meetup group, the largest such group in the country. When Hitchens came into the dining room where we were all seated, it moved many of us to tears, including me. He looked frail and walked slowly, but when it came time for him to speak, it was clear that his mental faculties were still razor sharp. Mason Crumpacker was really something, as you have pointed out already.
After my fall from a horse a couple of years ago, Coni was the first horse I got back up on, it was like slipping into a pair of comfortable old shoes, we meshed so well, I knew I would always be safe on her back.
In a certain light moths can fool and deceive. They can light up like butterflies or fireflies lighting up the lonely path down the railway line. But when they are gone we are filled with a sense of unreality, as if a spectral presence has buzzed low over our tombs.
It’s over. Now what?
I'm feeling ambivalent about extreme hops at the moment - which I'll write more about in due course - but I'm glad I now have a word to describe one of my favourite extreme hop aromas. I love it - it's a good word, slightly dangerous and a little alienating, and therefore perfect.
Pouchot’s undergrad research was about how to get women to the top, and consequently, the Levo League product is very research-based. They know that if a job description has gender-specific terms, such as “competitive,” women are less likely to apply. And a woman won’t apply to a job unless she has 100% of the qualifications listed, whereas a man will apply with only 65% of them. And women think about more than money when deciding whether to take a job. “They want to know whether they’ll fit in, whether they’ll be nurtured and if they can see a future there,” says Pouchot.
The in Vogue Omega Watches
I know several of us are starting testing this week. Keep your heads high and know that these tests are NOT a measure of our fabulous teaching ability NOR are they an accurate assessment of how beautifully brilliant our kiddos are!
an imagined past. It is the turning
The cast here are all excellent and they are perfectly cast to fit well into their roles. Sanjeev Kumar is effortlessly charming and debonair as Dr Ravi. His assertion that he wants a good Hindustani girl as his ideal wife did make me groan, but despite his initial statement he doesn’t seem to mind when Geeta dresses in more Western style clothes and he positively encourages her to go roller-skating (which may actually be something that good Hindustani girls do considering the number of times it happens in films). I’m often quite ambivalent when it comes to Dharmendra, but since he is rather overshadowed by Hema Malini and his over acting goes almost totally unnoticed beside the caricature of Kaushalya, I really enjoyed his performance. Both Pratima Devi as the long-suffering grandmother and Satyendra Kapoor as Kaushalya’s hen-pecked husband provide excellent support, as do the various other members of the cast. But it’s Hema and Manorama who are the two essential elements to the film and their scenes together still make me laugh every time.
But the problem with Ujang was that he was not tall, he was a giant – he suffered from a pituitary tumour that produced abnormal amounts of growth hormone.
Factionalism, corruption and the use of political violence (including assassination) were all part of the ANC's life in exile. All these tendencies were at work from the moment that the ANC relaunched itself back in South Africa in 1990. The truth was disguised for a while by the Mandela leadership cult but the fact is, of course, that the arms deal and the corruption it brought into the centre of South African life, occurred under Mandela's presidency.
his calls.
Yet.
*I believe the fruit is Melicoccus bijugatus, grown over a wide area of the tropics, including South and Central America, Mexico, the Caribbean, parts of Africa and the Pacific. It is called Spanish lime, chenette, guaya, guinea, genip, genipe, quenepa, mamoncillo, mamón, ackee, skinnip, kenepa, xenepa, canapé, knippa, limoncillo, anoncillo, or honeyberry.
Coldcut - More Beats & Pieces
When 26-year-old Emily Weiss launched Into the Gloss, a blog chronicling the highly detailed beauty routines of fashion insiders, she was already a fashion-industry veteran. She logged in years on fashion shoots while interning at Teen Vogue during college, and became a fashion assistant to Vogue contributing stylist Elissa Santisi after graduating.
*Double up on Veggies!
This, from Kibworth Beauchamp, is one better: it is the front wall of an old mud-walled cottage. It is situated close to the centre of the village and now serves as an outbuilding to a modern house that has been built behind it.
And she'll tease you
Tris has survived a brutal attack on her former home and family. But she has paid a terrible price. Wracked by grief and guilt, she becomes ever more reckless as she struggles to accept her new future.
In the summer of 2001, I went to El Salvador with a group of doctors that perform plastic surgery on children with cleft palates and cleft lips and other disfigurements. I was there for a week, and it was the most important thing I've done in my life except for having my babies.
I've now also done a baby girl version, embellished slightly differently so will pop that on tomorrow.
3 points - New Albanian Beak's Best - 2010 seemed to be the year that craft beer fans came back to sessionable (easy-to-drink, lower ABV) beer, and at 5.3% ABV, Beak's Best certainly fits that bill. I wrote, "The beer features a sweet malty front that's immediately chased off by a bitter bite. The nose is malty grainy goodness, and the beer tastes like a good brewery smells. It's a beer that's bitter in the best way." What I didn't know then was that I'd never be able to pass up the beer again; if I'm in a bar and it's on tap, I'm going to end up with a glass of Beak's in my hand.
Blue Asylum is well worth the wait. Hepinstall sets the story during the Civil War in an insane asylum on Sanibel Island. The beauty of the island starkly contrasts with the horrors of the institution. Blue water, lapping waves, white sand, and swaying palm trees almost suggest a vacation-like environment. Yet Sanibel Island is also home to snakes, alligators, sharks, and stingrays. However, the biggest threat on the island is not the wildlife.
Place eggs in a small pot / saucepan and fill up with water until eggs are submerged. Place on the stove and heat until water comes to a boil. Use a spoon to move the eggs around occasionally so that the yolks stay in the centre of the egg. Let it boil for about 3-5 minutes. The eggs should be semi-hard-boiled. Turn off the flame, discard the water and place the eggs in bowl of cold tap water to let them cool. Using the back of a tablespoon, tap the eggshell all over to create cracks that are deep enough without the shells breaking off in pieces.
"It was a beautiful day today."
Jill-my clothes
To Brian Quain: Who would have guessed that a few years ago (and a few days before your wedding to sweet Vanessa), that some nutty stranger would chat on the phone with you about LOST. I had a total blast doing the LOST Book Club podcasts with you. Look at where it brought us in our personal lives.
cute she was I knew she was coming home with us.
Comprehensive Risk Assessment
Now, do they speedy utmost, Meg,
“Copy. Out.”
I'm sure it will come. One of these days, likely when the coffee creamer stock pile (which I have NO problem buying in mass quantities) dwindles, I'm sure I'll happily go to Costco with a list of 15 things and leave with 50, spending oodles more than $100. Then I'll long for my early transitional days when Costco was too extreme! Crazy lady!
What are you designing
The inspiration for this dish? Leftovers. I didn't have a lot of energy to give to making dinner tonight, but I did have some leftover pork and some corn starring at me from the fridge.
Have you worked at a real job ?
More importantly, Proclamation No. 1801 covers not only Boracay Island, but sixty-four (64) other islands, coves, and peninsulas in the Philippines, such as Fortune and Verde Islands in Batangas, Port Galera in Oriental Mindoro, Panglao and Balicasag Islands in Bohol, Coron Island, Puerto Princesa and surrounding areas in Palawan, Camiguin Island in Cagayan de Oro, and Misamis Oriental, to name a few. If the designation of Boracay Island as tourist zone makes it alienable and disposable by virtue of Proclamation No. 1801, all the other areas mentioned would likewise be declared wide open for private disposition. That could not have been, and is clearly beyond, the intent of the proclamation.
Heads up, though. This is not a complete "Before And After" type house tour. None of our rooms are done. Most are not even remotely close. This tour is not meant to impress anybody. It's nothing more than an attempt to document... this is our house in March of 2012. All the rooms, at the same time. Three years after first picking up the paintbrushes.
- Repair broken articles that have coding issues from a server change over.
Once you get your Motivation Reaction Units correct you’ve discovered the secret to compelling fiction. Cool, huh? If you’ve got a question you’re itching to ask be sure to leave it in the comment section.
And the 2010/2011 spot goes to… I really want to say The Future, but seeing Holy Rollers again would be super. And there will probably be a Sofia Coppola spot, so I’m gonna go with “Somewhere”.
Boston Beer Company (Samuel Adams) Samuel Adams White Ale
There's a full tutorial on Spellbinders Paper Arts Blog. The rest of the product reveals will start next week. I am 'over the moon' excited to share all about them!!! I have to tell you, my kiddos spent about three hours in with me in craft room the other day. They were just creating away like crazy!! It was the most precious thing evah!
When presidents, prime ministers and Hollywood superstars line up to wish you happy birthday, and when your bash is hosted by superhero Will Smith, you know you've reached the very zenith of international recognition and are already inscribed in the annals of hagiography.
10-Procrastinated on closing the pool until yesterday. The pool man finished just 10 minutes before the snow started flying here in NY. Oh joy! There goes Fall right out the window. Old man winter is BACK. We're supposed to get hit hard again tomorrow.
Thanks for all your support and encouragement after yesterday's post. I was going to respond in the comments, but I thought I'd write a followup post instead because this is just too important to me.
VERDICT: The apples are not too sweet and the boiled cider really makes the flavor buds pop. The pancake has a custard-like texture and the lemon juice gives a perfect brightness to this dish. Next time, I'll remember to add the cinnamon into the apple mixture. I might double the apples, too. This is a hit and I intend to make this more often. You could definitely have some fun by adding raisins, in desired (and we love them) and even a scoop of vanilla to serve this as a dessert.
“We know each other? I am getting feeling that we met before” (He must have lots of experience to ask this question to change that ‘Time’ topic.)
I am sure there were lots of things that prevented him from progressing in his Jewish faith. And there would be churches today who would make it difficult for people to get to that point too! But not on this day! And he goes on his way rejoicing – which implies he had a story to tell.
- Jeff Hodge, DataCert
2-14-2012
Did you catch Santorum’s speech after Michigan and Arizona? By his attitude you wouldn’t know that he lost by over 20 points in one state and even cheating couldn’t win the other. Look at how happy he is. I don’t think he gets he lost. And lost big. Because don’t forget 9% of those who voted were Dems. And they were 53% for Santorum. So that gap between Romney and Santorum is actually a bit bigger.
I’ve probably mentioned this a number of times throughout this blog in passing, or in quick references.
The centenary celebrations of the ANC and their determination to dedicate the country to the ancestral spirits sparked nation wide controversy. How are we as Christians to respond? What does the Bible say concerning the spirits of our ancestors? To whom should South Africa be dedicated? Are there examples in history of other nations that have invoked the spirits of their ancestors? What were the results in those cases?
CHAPTER V BUSINESS AND THE PUBLIC
It outlines the route the ANC wants to follow against a "neo-liberal" media which depicts the government as "weak and passive", that "over-emphasizes people's individual rights" and is "fundamentally market-driven".
So take off that unbecoming frown
Notice: no refunds. Once we make the sale through PayPal all sales are final.
Though I had been in the famous hotel, Chateau Lake Louise, I had not seen it since its last major retrofit. The hotel is a historic evocation of Canadian Pacific Rail’s few deluxe, luxury hotels along its main railroad across Canada. It was first built in 1890.
Time is of the essence in any emergency and you simply don't have time to look stuff up on the internet during one.
Oh, the maid or the mother I’ll be
qualification of the "People's Republic of Cambridge"--I used to
On top of the pension, they are entitled to a tax-free pension lump sum, which is calculated at three times the annual pension. This gives long-timers a windfall of up to €150,000.
As if that wasn’t enough competition for the week, our public speaking participants were disappointed to learn that the ACSI public speaking festival was postponed due to the inclement weather on Thursday. This event has been rescheduled and will be on March 29th.
Paper: SU retired color (don't remember) BB, CC, Bazzill white, Silver PP (unknown), Acetate
There was a man sent from God, whose name was John. The same came for a witness, to bear witness of the Light, that all men through him might believe. He was not that Light, but was sent to bear witness of that Light. That was the true Light, which lighteth every man that cometh into the world. He was in the world, and the world was made by him, and the world knew him not. He came unto his own, and his own received him not. But as many as received him, to them gave he power to become the sons of God, even to them that believe on his name: Which were born, not of blood, nor of the will of the flesh, nor of the will of man, but of God. And the Word was made flesh, and dwelt among us, (and we beheld his glory, the glory as of the only begotten of the Father,) full of grace and truth.
Evan H. Gillette, 40, New York, N.Y.
Kirin Suika Soda is exactly what you'd expect: it tastes like artificial watermelon flavoring with bubbles in it. The packaging, with its red and green theme speckled with black "seeds" is pretty cute. All in all, eh, I guess it was worth 50 yen, but I still won't be finishing this one, either.
People please note that the new iPad had experienced battery, overheating and wifi issues.
Salvatore Gitto, 44, Manalapan, N.J.
donor-donor (I need a love transfusion)
This latter is nonsense. I read Connick’s law and cricket and life tweets – Most amusing.
May 3 March on RJ Reynolds tobacco company Winston Salem, NC 10am meet at Lloyd Presbyterian Church 748 N. Chestnut 27101 www.floc.com for more info.
a-plenty...at home, at parenting, at wifing, at the gas station, at painting furniture.
Bank: BDO – Iligan Quezon Avenue Branch
This is television at its blandest. Meaningless advice we’ve heard before dished out in easy to chew sound bites. How many days should a guy wait before he calls you? Who honestly gives a shit? Zwar seems to be under the impression that he’s revealing something extraordinary about the female sex that no man would ever have discovered unless they peaked through a copy of Cosmo in Year 8, or you know, spoke to a woman before. If Zwar knows this is kind of nothing information and it’s just a bit of a laugh you have to wonder why the show so damned bland a lot of the time.
Or dime affer dime… as Colton pronounced it. What was that? He was so nasily… like he suddenly had a cold. He did a version of this song which he took from the band
"Do you know anything about how they do it?" Sam asked.
There's a fascinating essay about the first ten Penguins here - not all the titles have lasted the test of time! Dashiell Hammett's 'The Thin Man' was one of the next ten.
The band’s 2010 debut, Twin-Hand Movement, was all swirling guitar harmonics and loosely structured psych meditations. Nootropics tightens things up considerably, streamlining chord progressions to a bare minimum, locking into a percussive stride somewhere between metronomic and playfully tripping, while frontwoman–I hesitate to say leader, as personalities seem very purposefully dwarfed here–Jana Hunter paradoxically steps out from the band’s foggy churn only to lay into a strict, almost formalist, meter and enunciation, which at times is as bleary as Beach House’s Victoria Legrand, her closest contemporary analogue. Her days as one of freak-folk’s most playful flower children are behind her, though her predilection for melodic concision and arms-length thematic disclosure remains almost confrontationally intact. As a result, there’s little way into the meaning of Lower Dens’ music–gleaning much from such curt titles as “Brains,” “Stem,” “Lamb,” and “Candy” can prove as tantalizing as it does frustrating–but in their dedication to lock-step precision and unmannered stylistic gestures, they seem to be courting dichotomous terrains between the analogue and the synthetic, the mortal and the mechanical, the artificial and the instinctive.
- Brad Blickstein, Blickstein Group
Tomorrow is a big game where Max may start against a good hitting team from a town that is always a power house. Isn’t it always that way? But now that I have seen how politically jammed up these town sports are, it doesn’t surprise me. You tend to get groups of guys entrenched for years and if they are good for the boys, then you have a long run of good outcomes and if they are not so good, then you tend have the families scattering and leaving the town team for club teams. In Max’s town, I think there are 10 or 11 families that have bolted in 3 years if you include up a level or out to club teams. Will the town examine this and ask the tough question of why this may be happening? What do YOU think? haha. –Fog
The best room is the one with the religious items and the 'going for pilgrimage' display. There's an egg with a whole chapter of the Quran written on it! On my last visit, my friend managed to keep a look out while I snapped a quick pic on my phone!
I chose fishing and grabbed myself this fab chap from Digi Stamp Boutique, that's a very big fish he's got isn't it???
There are only 8 days to go before our Funky Frontyard Farmer's challenge begins, when we attempt to feed ourselves for a full week almost entirely on what we have grown from our suburban block. Nature, unfortunately does not always work to such deadlines, and some things have not quite gone to plan. Last year we bagged at least 5kg of mulberries, our freezer and our children could not possibly fit in another single mulberry. This year, due either to the ridiculous amount of rain and lack of sunshine or our neighbours hacking off a major limb of the tree last year, we have experienced a mulberry famine, having picked less then a measly handful; Joe is berry upset.
Friday 5 March
set sd:sd_io_time=0x3c
Pantene $1/2
nail color (OPI "You Don't Know Jacques!")
By Monday I was feeling pretty traumatised, particularly since, on Sunday night, the mice had chewed through our wooden cutlery draw and placed all the wooden shavings amongst my forks and spoons, along with their shit. And on Monday afternoon, Tom had yet another unnerving encounter with a mouse who was hanging out next to our microwave, staring at him.
Rnd 4-9) ch1, hdc in each st around
With a succession of kills that Rockfig brought Nkateko to, the regular vehicle contact started paying dividends, and from the age of 7 months, Nkateko started getting much more relaxed when mom was around, and by the end of 2008 (10-11 months old), she was as relaxed as any young leopard in the reserve.
Miles Davis - Tribute to Jack Johnson - 1970
Third Prize: (Yes!) A signed paperback of Housewife with a Half-Life
Anyway, sitting around a campfire and melting marshmallows on it is one of those things we always did growing up. And it's one thing I want my girls to grow up doing too (more challenging given we live in the city, mmmm). So this Australia Day long weekend we are leaving the city behind and staying in a lovely little pioneer cottage near the Grampians in regional Victoria.
Genealogy bloggers can also play a role by becoming a 1940 Blog Ambassador! You can sign up, as I have, and you can get badges for your site or blog. There is exclusive content, blog post and contest ideas, blogger events, project updates and more. I can't think of a better way to spread the word and be a part of this community to help make the index of these images available to the public as quickly as possible.
When I first came to Japan in 1990, I was astonished that the Statute of Limitations for murder was fifteen years in this country. That meant that if the police didn’t arrest a murderer within that time, it would be impossible to charge him with the crime…even if he publicly confessed.
9. This one-hit wonder might have been followed by other hits if singer Kevin Rowland wasn't such a dick.
We believe in the conservation and protection of both the planet and it’s animals, and feel strongly about educating kids about animals, and empowering them with the ability to make a difference. To help give back we’ve partnered with, and are actively donating a portion of our proceeds to, several non-profit organizations dedicated to
A perfect day for apophenia – seeing patterns and connections in random or meaningless data. Some believe palindromic dates, especially double-figure ones, lead to good fortune. That’s wonderful news for weddings and birthdays, and who is going to forget them? Others, bad luck and even the end of the world is foretold.
And you know how it goes at Cell Phone stores... FOREVER to get stuff done. Captain America and I had fun playing with the IPads and such. He was pretending to make a call on this one. Apparently they're JUST like the droid, but they don't do phone calls. HA! He said he'd wait for them to be able to make phone calls too. Yeah, he'd be SUPER cool then.... hehe.
In its 38th citable decision of 2006, the Board affirmed a Section 2(a) refusal of the mark MOHAWK for cigarettes, finding that it falsely suggests a connection with the federally-recognized St. Regis Band of Mohawk Indians of New York. In re White, 80 USPQ2d 1654 (TTAB 2006).
See, I love to talk. And therefore I usually have a hard time keeping secrets. However, since it was my own butt on the line for this party, I made sure to not say a peep to Caitlin. I am so glad I didn't, because seeing her reaction when she walked in was by far my favorite part of the whole celebration.
had explained this, the witch, Willow, backed off.
I am sad, MichelleM. I am very, very sad.
festivities with friends.
Okay…here are the (almost) final stats numbers from this 5-day freebie sale on Amazon (see my previous posts for more on this). The sale goes to midnight (midnight Pacific time, I think), so it has a few more hours. But the numbers won’t be dramatically different from this, I don’t imagine.
"...But if it's becoming more of a liability than an asset for the operation in question, and the agents of that growing vulnerability (e.g., missiles, drones) suggest a new era is dawning, then you pay attention. Otherwise you risk Norm Augustine's nightmare coming true ("In the year 2054, the entire defense budget will purchase just one aircraft."): the military that becomes so expensive you can only afford one of anything – like the newest supercarrier (Gerald R. Ford) that rings in at $13-15B when all the bells and whistles are accounted for. It may be the only one the US Navy can ever afford to build, and a couple of DF-21Ds could send it to the bottom of the ocean - their many-and-cheap against our one-and-absurdly-expensive.
So, here we go…another chapter of this journey is about to begin…back to work with a new hip!! Let’s try it and see.
Canned salmon in water
Pekko Kappi, over at Space 2, didn’t quite connect with me and I do think that’s a shame. I approved of his playing the jouhikko (a traditional Finnish lyre), I approve of the way he played it (gleefully bowing away in the manner of an eight year old with a junior hacksaw), and I approved of his lyrics (settings of Finnish folk tales that sounded like narrations of Hell Brueghel paintings), but something just didn’t seem to work. I expect I’ll absolutely adore him the next time I encounter him.
Which pretty much sums up how I feel about it. The fact is that billionaire Buffett is more than welcome to pump money into the IRS if he feels like it. But he doesn’t. Instead he wants tax hikes for higher income people… who can all then avoid having to pay for it using dividend payments, bonus schemes, charities scams… you name it. Meanwhile, John Q. Public sleeps happy in his smaller, colder bed. Safe in the knowledge that Buffett’s feeling the pinch also, except he’s not…. and deep down everybody in the media knows it.
had us in a furore, each
WHATS THAT?
Ahmed a l'goût d'tripes
As somebody who has long preached that culture is everything in an organisation, it was all grist to my mill.
Monica writes her ass off in this beautiful essay about living in both wonderment and fear, inspired by thinking about the loss of her friend Katie's son Henry.
Fred was colored with Copics and the wood stump was colored and cut out a second time and popped up on foam tape for some dimension. The sentiment was cut out using the Die-namics Circle STAX 1 and 2. I love that these dies emboss on the FIRST pass. The fishtails under Fred were made with the Die-namics Fishtail Flags STAX. I cut one from patterned paper and the other from white cardstock and adhered them together one shorter than the other to give the white border to the fishtail. Some machine stitching finishes the front. The patterned papers are MME Miss Caroline "Fiddlesticks" 6x6.
I'm taking 3 kids to a place that they aren't writing guidebooks about yet. Yes, I know it's the second poorest country in the Americas. Yes, Nicaragua has active volcanoes, earthquakes and malaria. Trust me, my mother googled it all.
Yesterday, I said Dauphin Island was a bit touristy for me. Well, now I’m deep in back country Mississippi. Definitely not touristy. It’s actually kinda creepy.
The people continued in their transgression, they did not take guidance from the manifest proof. The Quraish (people) oppressed and harmed all those who followed him (Muhammad pbuh) from his tribe, put them to trials and afflictions in order to keep them away from their religion (Islam), even to the extent that they exiled them from their homeland, some of them fled to Ethiopia, some went to AlMadina (AlMunawwara) and some remained patient ( at Makka ) in spite of the harm they received; by being imprisoned, made to suffer from hunger and thirst and by being beaten (in a horrible manner)... so much so that some of them were not able to sit straight from the severity (of the injuries) of the beatings.
They want to co-create, and have conversations, and share values.
So Cobra Zero, what’s it like? Actually quite nice. I was expecting a vile nasty tasting piss like Kaliber, but found this to be drinkable. Now I have questioned before the point of Alcohol Free beer. Why would you want to drink it when you can drink something nice like Vimto? To be honest I haven’t the answer, and you can get Vimto in pubs these days, but drinking it in a pub would no doubt involve paying through the nose for it and being called a puff by your mates. I love Vimto, I’d describe it as my favourite drink, bar none. Maybe I’ll start a Vimto blog.
You readers can be my judge =) I feel like posting here will motivate me to finish these cakes, instead of leaving them lying around my room! You have just hopped on my cake sewing journey of summer 2012!
Probably why I am a little stressed!
P.S. – In the future, you should always use an open parentheses “(” if you are going to use a close parentheses “)” – proper English is important in business dealings!
One intriguing, more scalable alternative, used in Asia by a couple of companies, is facial imaging. Conducted via webcam, it measures consumer emotional response to advertising, product concepts, TV programs and other marketing stimuli, and is relatively low cost to administer. Based on Darwin’s theory that facial expressions of happiness, fear, disgust etc. are innate and universal (thus unaffected by culture, ethnicity etc), and developed for the mobile age, this approach can access parts of the consumer psyche without having to resort to direct questioning. For more background go to http://www.nviso.ch
o Mystery Gallery (514 S. Main) Metal sculptures by Aston Stovern Photography by Linda Teeter, Doug DeVoe and MaryAnn Soerries Jewelry by Marta Churchwell and Brenda Hayes Works in acrylics, pen & ink by Sherry Pettey Pottery by Daria Claiborne Live music performed by Patti Nicoletti Johnson
Perhaps the Citizen should ask their readers if they can think of a way to reduce the number of MPs from 650 to 600 without some constituents getting a different MP? I wonder if some of TiG’s sister papers are running ‘Save Our MP’ campaigns?
I guess it is because this room is always full. Always noisy. Always bustling. And I'm always half stressed.
If South Africa had lost the war, these countries would have looked a lot different toady. One only has to look north to the other countries in Africa where the communists took over to know what general Geldenhuys is talking about.
I've been a bit of slacker the last couple days. I haven't blogged in a couple days, and yesterday wasn't the most cleansing day. Oh well, I still followed the rules- no gluten, sugar, coffee or animal products (that part's easy since I'm vegan), but I haven't made the healthiest choices and I haven't been eating enough raw food!
BSS: "Why'd you leave this apartment?"
I've been thinking lately about the state of Christ's church on earth. The Roman Catholic Church is a synagogue of satan and the pope is an antichrist. The Eastern churches are synergistic and semi-pelagian. The Arminians teach a form of semi-pelagian synergism that is essentially a works based religion where election and perseverance are conditional on man and not on God's mighty power and sovereignty.
this will be Maluckyday.
I think I saw a commercial for these and made my husband go to the store for me and pick them up. They are as good as you might think. So good that I ate a bowl of them real late at night the other night, like I was in college. And I am not a cereal girl. Delicious!
I found the weekly topics (as well as the sub-topics used on the daily lessons) were very well thought out, and used a good assortment of different verses pertaining to love. There was enough background content included in each section that helped you to think, but not enough to give you all of the answers yourself. You really had to think about things and had to “dig deep” within yourself to answer the questions (most of which were directed at your personal feelings, etc.)
Even this newspaper, however, cannot wholly keep to the line. It has UK climate researcher Adam Scaife offer an alternative explanation.
That being said, I've also read a ton lately about how some areas of the world are just write-offs. They don't do the basic things for themselves, and then expect people to come and help them. They make it harder for aid workers. They become violent, and then put the aid workers at risk. We're seeing it in Haiti right now, where many people are shooting doctors and aid workers and creating such a risky security situation that some aid workers have to pull out.
Above is the back side of the pit area. Below are Omran, Crystal, Magnus and Paul chatting between races.
If you’re talking politics it means, “TAXES ARE FOR TERRORISTS” – it tells other people that you never affiliate so closely with a political party that you’re willing to draw blood for it. Instead, you’re willing to hit yourself in the head with a metaphorical frying pan to avoid it. You’re willing to tell the world, “Taxes are for terrorists” like a stupid-head, like a person who doesn’t make sense. It’s your version of Klinger wearing a dress in an attempt to get 86’d out of a war zone. (M*A*S*H…What did it stand for? First to answer in comments section, wins a horrible cyber prize.)
As an act of self-preservation, Germany will be forced to either exit the euro outright or cloak its withdrawal with a "euro 1 and euro 2" scheme, a scenario I first laid out in March 2010: Why the Euro Might Devolve into Euro1 and Euro2 (March 2, 2010). Other recent entries on the end-state of the European debt crisis:
When the wind began and the water came at us sideways, we knew we were in trouble. We were still against the Seine and the other side of the street was nothing but a parade of blank facades -- not an awning or overhang to be seen.
You go on and take care of moon business up there. I'll take care of Erin business down here. We can meet in the middle when the stars align properly and when they don't, no worries.
Karamani vella Sundal (Black eyed beans with jaggery)
Eek!
Sorry for being late in fully introducing you to your Jewish roots. In a desperate attempt to bore you to sleep tonight, we let you watch part of Fiddler on the Roof. We told you that had you been born 100 years earlier in ancestral Russia, this would have been your life -- no toys -- just singing and dancing.
The substantial edit for Dogtooth Chronicals has taken around three months. This is unusual, but my editor has been ill in parts and it’s a longer, more complicated book than the average Joe (500 odd pages layered in chewy, delectable prose, or some such). Also I didn’t want to rush this part, as this was also my time space to work on my ‘web presence’. So I’ve been steady in completing my side of the editing based on the feedback I received.
She beckoned Jasper, her faithful butler and constant sexual companion, over to her side. He had provided many nights of pleasure to both her and Roger over the years, but he held a special place in her heart. In fact, she would say she loved him. But Jasper was British, and extremely proper. Providing services for his employers was in his job description, and yes, perhaps he had grown fond of his lady over time. And although he knew of her feelings for him, he would never, in a million years, admit to loving her back.
Linked by the firebombing of a research clinic, Theo and Rachel fear they are targets of an extremist group, who will stop at nothing to silence them.
Starring: Reg Park, Fay Spain, Luciano Marin, Laura Atlan, Salvatore Furnani, and Ettore Mani
A faint smile crossed Sandra’s face, but then she shook her head: “I couldn’t do that to another woman. Besides, she’d know it was a hoax if she hadn’t been to the clinic.”
2) They have been hooked from an early age
I heard a horror story the other day about a big London agency that had turned around it’s entire account handling and planning department in just a few years.
First, I weighed myself this morning and I met my weight loss goal. I’ve lost 32 pounds!!! Now, I guess I need to re-assess and decide how much more I wish to lose. I think I will set a 10 pound weight loss goal now. Let’s go!!!
Wilcox AJ, Baird DD, Weinberg CR, Hornsby PP, Herbst AL. Fertility in men exposed prenatally to diethylstilbestrol. N Engl J Med 1995; 332: 1411-1416.
and every night he pertcheth him
But what could this possibly mean? If an Egyptian-born radical Muslim who incited violence against non-Muslims, advocated global jihad, and was implicated in a variety of terrorism-related activities could be British, then we are forced to one of two conclusions. The first is that the category of the British citizen had degenerated to the point where it was compatible with these activities, in which case it would be hard to see why it should be granted any significance. The other is that the state was simply wrong, and that, legal issues notwithstanding, Abu Hamza was not British. Either way, the currency of citizenship would have been debased, with a British passport ‘just not worth what it used to be.’
Did you know...
1/2 cup (1 stick) margarine
I told Sandra about our dilemma when she was giving Darrell his lunch, and the little rapscallion was positively thrilled by my suggestion that we could put his talent to good use. His mother was less certain.
My other friend works for a designer in Paris. She spoke about motifs used in womenswear where anything goes. She sent me some links to next Spring/Summer's Prada collection which has a vintage car motif as a core feature of the collection. It's very pretty and I guess that women's prints don't often feature more 'male' motifs, but as she said, times have changed and now at events such as Indigo prints are no longer really split into categories as buyers prefer to look through everything for something that catches their eye. Childrenswear is different though. It's definitely not, anything goes.
Though separate upon our path
If I Knew Now What I Knew Then by Big Sandy & His Fly-Rite Boys
And another thing...
Peter Dawes
i got the letters at joann's, and found vintage books at the goodwill.
Green onions--store in plastic bag in fridge for up two weeks
Me: I need you to run to the store
Jeans: Acne
Me: “No. I’m saying you might have to do one or the other.”
One day in December she snuck out to a vintage toy store called The Toys Time Forgot. She bought me a bunch of great geeky stuff. And the amazing thing is, I didn't have any of this stuff yet.
Savannah - 11
Another alternative cover features the American Idol soon-to-be mentor, who was styled by close friend Nicola Formichetti, in an Indian inspired look. Gaga’s face is bejewelled with gold Indian beading, which include a pieced nose. She also sports a fierce fringe on the cover.
Peter has also been one of my go-to guys this year as JMU communications has covered JMU’s first graduating class of student engineers. All year, I’ve relied on Peter and many of his fellow engineers to answer questions, pose for photos and answer engineering questions. For two years, Peter and his team have worked to develop and build a firefighting robot. Given that he’s an engineering student and he worked on the iPad app, I was amazed to learn that Peter has also been a member of the Marching Royal Dukes. How does he fit all this into 24 hours?
School
Anyway, we are cruising down the freeway and start pulling off at the Verizon center---which Aaron had assumed the concert was at with minutes to spare---only to find that the place was a ghost town! No cars anywhere! Uh oh. Are you seeing a theme to our evening?
Then I had to do a little math and figure out how much fabric I'd need.
My son and I went to visit my in-laws March 18th at their home, I think my sis-in-law was there too. My in-laws were both at home now, but neither doing very well. I was dreading seeing them, things had changed so much when we separated, but now even moreso somehow. It wasn’t any one specific thing, might only have been my own thought processes, but I felt it was different. It wasn’t as relaxed as it once was and I was on guard not to say anything that I shouldn’t in case it upset them.
106. Lay has been well known since childhood, because once he frequently appears on TV Show.
This was little man's first day of his first summer break so he was home. That is when my day became interesting. I had a brief nap on the couch and then the rest of our day turned in to what I like to call "Transformer Hell".
"CON EDISON" manhole cover.
The research uncovered how racist chatter often permeates the workplace.
He had fallen asleep (or so we assume, he was awake when we found him) in my bed, under the covers (I hadn't made my bed). I had been in my room at least four times but never checked under the covers. I was more thinking he was just hiding from me so I checked his hiding places.
After extensive review, the University of British Columbia has decided not to
Change Programme. TESTA is a methodology – transforming the experience of students through assessment – based on group interviews with students. See www.testa.ac.uk
“Of course,” laughs Andi, “the blogging world decided otherwise!”
Heat up frying pan and add in the vegetable oil. Sauté the shallots and cinnamon until fragrant. Add in the wet twisted tau kee and potato. Add frozen vegetable mix and salt to taste. Serve while still hot.
So. Huge fan here. Just saying. Can't wait for the next episode (and dearly, dearly hoping that this vlog series continues through the whole book).
-The cool breezes that frantically fan the electronics to prevent overheating
Wings: Hand Drawn/Painted and Doodled by me Nancy Baumiller
It wasn't long after, that Mary went to stay with her daughter.
1. Instrumental
we've come a long way, baby!
I scored this mirror ages ago and it's been waiting for the perfect spot. Proof that you don't need to shop kid's stores for children's rooms. They are little people, but can still appreciate big design.
Winner : BeerMerchants
The Federal Reserve bankers knew about this gold, and concocted a systematic plan in the 1700s to seize it.
"Nice day for a hike, huh?" I said.
who gave that right to me,
wordblasted
I know it to be fact.
Or how about war? War is easily one of the biggest problems the world faces at present. Military conflicts all over the world, caused, funded, manipulated, and involving the US and its henchmen, sorry, allies, are continuing to create financial, ecological, and humanitarian crises on a scale never seen before. Not only are they tearing countries apart, laying waste to the countries themselves, more often than not using weapons of mass destruction, (an issue I’ll cover in a coming post), killing millions of innocent people…MILLIONS of INNOCENT people, they’re also bankrupting, in the case of the US and, in the UK drastically cutting the amount of money being spent on the essential infrastructure of the country. And all this despite the fact that the wars being waged are illegal according to international law. If that wasn’t enough, the corporate connections in government are doing everything they can to fan the flames of war higher, everywhere they can, to create maximum profits for their war machine industry. As is stated in Psyclone:
Amanda Bynes
Vivuli sent a couple of his rats into the manor house through an arrow slit on the ground floor. The rats saw no direct signs of life; the ground floor was empty. There were signs of recent armed struggle here and there, including a few bloodstains on the floors and a menacing looking scratch near the secret door to the basement level, but no living thing stirred.
- Smudge RN Falklands Vet/ and RMR, Worcester, 10/3/2012 20:31
I'm not wearing underwear, so minds out of the gutter.
- Pulse - if it's available - looks like and sounds similar to sine, but in place of the low troughs, it has level plains.
I have a draft of an e-mail I was about to send Mark -- nothing big, just something I'd come across that I thought he'd enjoy, an anecdote about Robert Heinlein trying unsuccessfully to collaborate with Fritz Lang on a space travel film years before Destination Moon was made by George Pal. One of Mark's specialties was alternate history cinema, films that never were but could have been made. The prospect of Heinlein and Lang teaming up seemed like his sort of thing. Now I'll never get to send that message to him and find out what he thought of the idea, or whether he'd read Bill Patterson's biography of Heinlein and had already been pondering the topic.
Cut the loaf into slices (crust or no crust: your call, but save the cumbs) and pour the hot milk over them in a large bowl. Cover the bowl with a clean kitchen towel or a cutting board (careful that it doesn't tip the bowl) to keep in the heat and moisture. Fry the bacon pieces in a medium pan. When the bacon is browned, pour it, grease and all, over the soaking bread in the bowl. When the mixture cools, add the eggs, salt, and pepper. Mix gently but thoroughly.
May The Lord, Who loves Jerusalem, and us condemn you, satan, in Jesus Christ Name, Amen!
Wireless networking is prone to some security issues. The risks to users of wireless technology have increased as the service has become more popular. Wireless security is the prevention of unauthorized access or damage to computers using wireless networks.
There is for the first time since the war a general sense of security. The people are more cheerful. There is a greater sense of general gaiety of spirit throughout the land. It is a happier Germany. I saw it everywhere, and Englishmen I met during my trip and who knew Germany well were very impressed with the change.
Trio Mocotó is a Brazilian band, originally formed in 1968 in the Jogral nightclub in São Paulo, and reformed in 2000.
Just remember to wear your seatbelt though and carry a blunt instrument, just in case this companion turns out to be an imposter (or perhaps psycho killer) who shouldn't be in your life at all!
Mo and
･MEDIAS
Short courses for adults about contemporary art, where you:
The famous US Civil Rights march from Selma to Montgomery is being reenacted this week, and I was watching the Reverend Al Sharpton (organizer) on television, talking about it. At the same time, I was grieving the loss of my old friend Terri, and I was looking up some of our old haunts in Columbus, Ohio. Much has changed; so much, I often barely recognize the place. (Google Street View is an amazing invention.) I couldn't find Crystal Swim Club, where we spent the majority of our summers. When I last visited Columbus (2006), I had vainly tried to find it, circling and re-circling the neighborhood.
4. We also sell rabbit meat, wool, lamb and eggs.
"Yeah." Rel grappled with a hundred things he wanted to say, and all that came out through the storm of warnings, well-wishes and goodbyes was, "You too."
I believe in angels, do you? Whether it's the literal kind, with feathery wings, or the more human kind,(like the ones that stop when your stuck in the middle of no where to help you change your tire cause your 7 months pregnant and its midnight and then they just drive away not asking for anything in return) angels are all around you just have to open your eyes and look. (at least that's my opinion)
Those who looked in disbelief
"Knock it off ensign, when you're Admiral you can pretty much do as you please," Maya replied back sharply. Moral was rather low, but not dangerously so.
Matilda was super excited at the airport. No where near showing her tiredness. She was smiling from ear to ear and having a great time showing off her new tiger backpack and rolling luggage.
Shape the meat into a loaf that is about 5 inches wide, and 2 inches thick.
For awhile we have wanted to have our own bee hives. As well as pasture land, we have rainforest, a large mixed orchard, a macadamia grove, wild food and flower gardens and numerous wind/privacy breaks of native trees. We have had some hives here for a few years that belong to someone else, but for various reasons we decided to learn more about the honey bee business ourselves...
Because I was born prematurely, my lungs were not fully developed and I could not breathe on my own, I was placed in an airtight incubator after birth. Either the oxygen in the incubator burned my eyes, or the lighting in the nursery for newborns caused me to become totally blind.
If you hear something late at night
1. On Green Dolphin Street
Kris must confront a simulacrum of his ex-wife Hari, who killed herself because she could not live without him. This façade is plucked from his mind and she is created in his mental image, with all of her flaws and weaknesses…as remembered and imagined by Kris. I think this is an important distinction and why Kris ultimately fails: Hari is form to his own biased and anxious emotions, so when she committed suicide Kris believed it to be his fault. He spirals deeper and deeper into depression and remorse unable to reciprocate her unconditional love; time after time redemption trickles through his fingers like water. But this automaton is becoming human in its own way, and makes the one final selfless decision for love, revealing Kris’s egocentrism because he can’t believe she would make that sacrifice for him, proving that Kris didn’t understand the “real” Hari at all.
- Our yard sale was a success! $484 raised!!!
1. Firstly, it does not depend on the other
Jennifer Hudson's self-titled 2008 album was by no means bad but was in many ways a misfire, coming along too late to capitalize on Dreamgirls and not featuring much from its all-star cast of producers and songwriters that made the most of that big, amazing voice. I Remember Me is not a very different album but is subtly superior in almost every way (despite not having a knockout hit on the level of "Spotlight":). This time the murderer's row of R&B hitmakers turns in more top shelf material, including Alicia Keys, who seems to be making the most of her maternity leave from stardom by writing some pretty good songs for others, and J-Hud just seems more comfortable and assured of what kind of music that voice should be accompanied by.
Inspection teams from several departments, including the police, health authorities and supervision agencies, have been sent to Zhejiang, Hebei and Jiangxi provinces to supervise the investigation of the case, according to a statement from the SFDA.
I have neither lost or found religion so it affects nothing I do in my infertility journey. I am not religious. It is something I do not wish to talk about though because I do not want to offend any person or group.
As this convergence of transformative events around the spring of 1919 suggests, one of the central features of the Wilsonian moment was its simultaneity across the boundaries of nations, regions, and empires within which the histories of the anticolonial movements of the period are usually enclosed. It was a brief but intense period in which people across the world directed attention and actions toward the drama unfolding in Paris, with the U.S. president as its leading protagonist. In part, the story of the Wilsonian moment is one of the articulation and circulation of ideas, most prominently the idea that all peoples had a right to self-determination and the related notion of a liberal international order structured around a league of nations in which all members would be equal in status if not in power. The emergence of Wilson’s ideas about the postwar international order, their gradual articulation and refinement in his wartime rhetoric, and their dissemination — both intentionally through the efforts of U.S. wartime propaganda, and circumstantially through the contemporary infrastructure of global communications, which was dominated by pro-Allied news agencies such as Reuters — are all important components of the story told here.
Think about it, if you created 100 blogs they would all still need to be updated so how would could you keep them updated on a daily regular basis. Soon you will find yourself swamped with work so it should be notified that you need a plan. The plan is if you don’t want to publish articles on your 100+ blog network then it’s time for you to do some hiring in particular for writers to post content for you. This idea to hire available writers is highly clever. If you can hire about 30 writers per 3 blogs assigned to each then that would be magnificent, and a great benefit for your business.
This is 2012, hockey is not just for men anymore. I hope this is the minority and in my experience it is, but it still bothers me. Almost every guy I have played hockey with or have met that plays hockey is always surprised, but I have always been respected and treated equally (for the most part). There are still a few bad eggs out there that will never grow up and get over it.
There is a training and nutrition seminar hosted by the BAA tonight in copley that I am thinking of attending. other than that, this will be a relatively light week with some shorter distances during the week and then 13 miles on the weekend.
Summer has a way of bringing me back to my youth. Im not sure if its the short shorts and sundresses, the long days on the water with your best friends or the sunkissed skin that brings me back, but all are welcomed with open arms!
Next week, I'll show you some ideas for our Grand Monarch Lantern!!!
I've been doing a number of library visits, talking to teenage reader groups about what they like to read. I've also started to do school visits. I'm very fortunate to have a great publicity manager at Macmillan who helps sort these things out.
The Lemon Drop Kid (1951) ... TCM ... 8 PM
One of my colleagues is forever sending me email links to recipes or food pictures, prefaced by the line "if you loved us, you'd make us these". On Tuesday she sent me a link to this biscuit version of a turducken, which gave me the idea for these double chocolate, double almond delights. They look like ordinary chunky chocolate chip cookies from the outside, but there's a scorched almond hidden inside. They are heavenly. Greer, if they actually make it out of the house this morning, you're going to LOVE them...
However he felt, he was opening up. She found another question easily. "How many Gifted does Tendullor have?"
Needless to say, no cheese and artichoke chowder were had for dinner...but the regular ol' artichokes were eaten alongside for good measure.
(crossposted from The Big Idea)
If you would prefer you can also put the dish in the oven if it is microwave safe and do it that way. It’s all about your personal preference. I like it this way because it isn’t something I have to slave over (unlike the boxed concoction I made tonight with dinner) and just about anyone can do it.
Kaká: 8
Embellishments- AC Moore (my old pal, the Dollar Bin)
“There was a heated discussion and someone came and took a flag, but there wasn’t any violence or fighting taking place. This was a deliberate act of provocation. They illegally entered the parade that we have received authorization from the police to hold. The police also came and told them to leave after a while,” Dydland tells Aftenbladet.
The holiday shopping season is officially upon us and to celebrate the season with my blog followers, I've created a special discount for you to use if you make a purchase from my shop between today and the end of the holiday season.
Price: $39.99
It's winter here in Chicago. Brewing has been sparse since I only brew outdoors. I did manage to brave the cold for a few sessions this month. Putting together a beer for a competition and one for my enjoyment. You may recall this Summer I went on a huge session beer kick. I love the challenge of getting maximum flavor and without impacting the beers drinkability. Keeping brew like this in my kegerator free's up my beer budget substantially, another positive. I must say this urge hasn't left, as you can tell from the recipe's below. Enjoy and as always, constructive feedback is appreciated.
The 15-person blog team will employ a technique called “fusion journalism,” representing a new vision of journalism applied in real-time situations. Western iMedia will integrate traditional storytelling with video interviews, photography and crowdsourcing social media.
Corals: CR3, CR2
Shuttle required: yes
“But now that there is no more place for me to work in these regions, and since I have been longing for many years to see you, I plan to do so when I go to Spain. I hope to visit you while passing through and to have you assist me on my journey there, after I have enjoyed your company for a while” (Romans 15:23-24).
to make batter.
sang a remixed version of P-
She says AIDS drugs such as reverse transcriptase inhibitors and integrase inhibitors, as well as nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs and cancer-fighting proteasome inhibitors, could be tested as potential treatments for CFS.
“Your sweet, loving wife doesn’t have an income right now. She doesn’t go back to work for at least two more weeks.”
Looked the quotes as you walk in too.
I’ve written a few stories set in Scotland and it’s hard to know where to draw the line when it comes to dialect. Some authors like Irvine Welsh take it to one extreme – I’ve lived my whole life here and yet I struggle with his prose – whereas others include just enough touches to give us the feel without burdening the readers. For my tastes Andrew is a little light on the Scotticisms. I would have written part of the above as:
Pamela Palmer was there with her latest book in her Feral Warriors series. I was so excited to get this book I had to know what would happen to Tighe and Hawke! I was all worried because they were stuck in a spirit trap at the end of the last book and I had to wait since last June to find out how they’d be saved! It was almost too much to bear people. Not only did I get resolution on my worries but I got to see Kougar feel again and Ariana be the queen she was meant to be. This couple is also better together, the book is a fabulous addition to this addicting series and I can’t wait for the next one! I can’t wait to find out more about Xavier and the new feral warrior. Oh and to see if Wulf has found his love and doesn’t even know it yet. Oh I almost forgot, as in the last book we get some time in Harpers Ferry, how cool is that! I won’t be able to see the Jefferson Rock without thinking about Kougar.
Dogs lie down, doing their own inner voyaging.
Keep checking back at Carolina Pad, they have some AMAZING new prints that will be coming out very soon!
For the trip of sheep,
You have until Sunday 7th August to enter and the winners will be announced Wednesday 10th August.
In Deuteronomy 24, God through Moses gives Israel a series of laws that pertain to business and financial concerns. Now God understands that we must all make a living-- He came up with that idea! But all of these laws assume that there is a bond of humanity and brotherhood that is more important than getting ahead in business. Notice for example--
Click on the button below to check out the other wonderful I Heart Macro pictures!
The benefits of taking up Karate are tremendous. Joining a dojo (training hall) can lead to making friends and a great sense of camaraderie can be gained as you commence your journey at white belt and progress through your journey with the prestigious ultimate reward of black belt being in your sights.
And Jake is a huge tool, but with tie clips, less is more. They exist so you DON’T need to think about your tie. It’s like, tie’s locked down. Thin, silver, locked up. Also, pocket square? If you do, straight line, like Draper would do. No poofy thing or triangle. Straight line. Bourbon. Lazers. Bears. Just in case they make you wear one in the future. I wouldn’t steer you wrong. You wouldn’t steer me wrong with wine either. Good looking out. Glad we did this.
Add squash to a medium pot and cover with water. Bring to a boil and cover; cook until soft. When soft, drain; add to food processor and pulse a few times until chopped (mine was almost pureed). Add 2 cups of squash to a medium bowl. Combine squash with remaining ingredients except olive oil spray and mix well.
In 1998, a U.S. federal grand jury indicted Robert Shull and his brother, Terry, for allegedly manipulating the share price of Fairmont Resources Inc., which traded on the Alberta Stock Exchange.
And then there were 6, and I froze, as one last man appeared and stood across the last small gap between their human chain and the entrance to the trail, tilting his head back and looking me over through slitted eyes, spreading his legs apart as if expecting some sort of impact, as if to lower his center of gravity, with arms crossed.
Remember when you click on Shop NOW, there are many clearance items (great pricing) and also the remaining items that are retiring. Both are while supplies last.
Autistic Spectrum Disorder. Did she mean Aspergers? Yes, she did. Leaflets would be sent, letters written to the school, referrals to other services made. It confirmed what I'd long thought, so it was a relief, maybe I hadn't been a paranoid parent all these years.
If you read yesterday's post then you know I cheated on my diet. But you know what? I still LOST 8.2lbs this week!!!! The nutritionist at my doctor's office asked me for advice I could give her other patients because I did so well this week. Aw, little ol' me?
We are so excited about this!!! On July 31, 2009 I posted Workout #1 and here we are a year later fixing to post Workout #25!!
The Human Realm is a special condition of incarnation, a place of extraordinary possibility, where the path toward enlightenment can be accessed in a way that is not possible through other incarnative states (animal, god, etc.). The experience of this human life is just this, the drudgery of the daily grind, the momentary experiences that make up the day, the nested choices within choices that we must make on a daily basis often at the unconscious level as those of us concerned with movement upon a spiritual path seek to achieve more consistent mindfulness and awareness of our journey, thereby gaining control over what is an emotion-fraught and distraction-laden existence, filled with the misery of desire and its resultant suffering.
This post shall be largely on my personal experiences onboard this tour. I shall offer some leads and contact information of the relevant services that I had came across as part of the tour. However, since I am neither a trained medical professional nor a master in any of these traditional methods of healing, there will be very limited sharing on the traditional methods of healing I had came across during the tour.
That people don’t talk like that
Here they come, the young men with the unwieldy name and topiary haircuts, waving the flag for revitalised UK guitar rock 2002. They have last year's most idiosyncratic Top 40 hit, 'Kill All Music' under their second-hand belts, and a (deserved) reputation for bone-rattlingly bonkers live performances. Still, they're an unlikely bunch. Cooper Temple Clause don't so much kill music as deconstruct and reanimate it like deranged Dr. Frankentein's stitching together limbs from every conceivable genre onto a twitching post-rock torso.
What I'm not liking is the fact that whenever I get working at what I think should be my standard level of productivity, the fumes in my studio (due mainly to the Damar in the beeswax medium, since I use odorless mineral spirits for thinning) become rapidly overwhelming.
I really don’t think this is going to be a problem at all. First off, Shaq is surrounded by a team of players who are just out to win. Who’s to say that Shaq is no different? It seems to me he just wants a championship ring for his pinkie finger and doesn’t singing a contract worth virtually nothing to him show that he is all about winning? Also, there is no way that Shaq still thinks he is still the main man in town. Again, he is surrounded by great players and the fact that nobody is willing to give him a contract with a significant amount of money should be humbling to a man of his stature.
Any U.S. aid cut to Egypt, top MB lawmaker Essam el-Erian told the pan-Arabic al-Hayat newspaper, would violate the U.S.-brokered 1979 peace agreement with Israel.
I've been forced to sit still. And as I sat, I learned to hear the quiet.
When you're choosing between Le Creuset enameled cast iron and All Clad Stainless, remember the All Clad, which in my opinion cooks as well as the Le Creuset, is much lighter to handle. Over the long haul, you might consider this an advantage; I do.
4 organisms
Mugison: Absolutely not.
Once upon a time in my younger adulthood, I rarely ate sandwiches, other than tuna. I also had minimal experience of grilled cheese, other than as cheese piled on a slice of bread and run under the broiler until bubbly and crusty. These two facts seem unrelated, but are not.
Border Punch: Stampin' UP!
“Make sure you send them the talking points after we finish up. I want everyone to be on board and on a message by noon tomorrow”, King Herod said.
Sunday when I got home we went to the Yacht Club near our house for Happy Hour and saw this beautiful rainbow. It is hard to tell from my picture but it stretched across the whole sky, it was stunning and it was Sterling's first rainbow!
The scenes with the young actors are really nice with some great dialogue and lot of humour. The adult characters are a bit more thinly drawn and other than Jackson we don’t really get to see them do very much, other than get in way. The military are the bad guys with secrets they are willing to kill to keep which is typical in a lot of 80s films involving aliens that this film is an homage to. There were lots of nice touches that fixed the film in the late 1970s such as the film technology the boys used, the Super 8 film
…Ha-ha charade you are…
Here’s a song I wrote a few months ago with my friend Ray Barnette and we had the best time writing it…hope you’ll have a good time listening to it too…;-)
Thank you for brightening my day with new growth and green leaves. Without you there would never be dirt on my hands or beautiful flowers to fill my vases.
Remember when I put kennel in my car for the cat? Well, I had taken it out the day before. Ooops! I put the cat in the car without a kennel. It was like trying to contain a tornado in a pickle jar. That cat FREAKED! She ended up under the brake pedal for the 14 mile drive home to her new house.
Doesn't add much from the last time you saw the design as his head is there and such, just filled the space in around. As I work on the next page you'll start to see the second dragon come into view better (the blue stuff on the left side is the beginning of that dragon).
3. Don’t eat gassy foods before a speech. Actually don’t eat at all.
I hope we are still on speaking terms.
“We formed a community council and trained the elders in conflict resolution. The elders wanted help resolving conflict but they were not addressing the root of the problem.”
If this were, say, two years ago, that would be a reasonable request. But it has taken Obama the better part of his first term to finally put in place serious sanctions—and at this late date, the sanctions may still not be strong enough to work. Speaking to AIPAC, Netanyahu implicitly responded to Obama: We gave diplomacy a chance for a decade, and sanctions for the last six years. If you’re asking for more time—when we are now looking at Iran achieving nuclear capacity in months rather than years—the sanctions had better be tougher.
She lives a few states away and I’ve been thinking about her a lot recently. In an old journal, I found a recipe she’d given me.
Exposition, in terms of fiction writing, is the method an author uses to convey information such as back story, setting, theme, plot and description, and while being obviously very handy, the general rule of exposition in fiction is this: a little goes a long way. The trouble with too much exposition is that it alienates and disengages the reader. We’ve all read it: page after page of information and details that supposedly need remembering (raise your hand if you gave one or more exhausted sigh of impatience while Oscar Wilde expounded upon the brilliant details of Dorian’s fine things for an entire chapter in The Picture of Dorian Gray). Often times, we skim over exposition to get to the “action” and find at the end of the story that we didn’t really miss anything by skipping over the exposition anyway.
Condiment bottles with nary a trace of dried crud on their outsides.
Sometimes, although it has been a while since I experienced one. More often than not, they’ve some from other parts of the country (distance from the source being a determinant of desirability, according to one school of thought, though I digress).
They work really well, too.
Job interviews are, generally, not fun. You’re trying to prove your worth as quickly and efficiently as you can — sometimes in 20 minutes or less. If things don’t go quite right, before you know it you may find yourself getting the “Don’t call us…” line and a limp handshake.
Lucy scratched her bare shoulder and shuddered at little. When she looked at her hand, there was the slightest hint of blood on her bright pink fingernails. “Oops,” she said, “Guess I scratched myself.” Her voice seemed to raise a pitch as she said it. The man in the shadows suddenly stood up from his seat. He walked forward and took a seat next to the young woman holding her child. She moved over to give him room.
Tibbs nodded. “Indeed, sir.”
Here’s a couple of my favorites. The rest are on the Flickr.
The rosewater lychee is so powdery sweet and evocative, it will make you feel like a French princess. Maybe even Carla Bruni.
Prepare pasta per package instructions. Meanwhile, in a nonstick sauté pan over medium-high heat, stir bacon until browned, 4 to 5 minutes. With a slotted spoon, transfer bacon to paper towels to drain. Add shallots and sauté until tender, 3 to 5 minutes. Add the wine to deglaze the pan, simmer for 1 minute. Add the corn and simmer for 5 minutes more. Stir in the cream and simmer for another minute. Stir in the basil, bacon and pasta.
And that is remarkably miraculous good news. But we do not do it alone. Think of it: what has happened is we have been pushing the boulder uphill, uphill, uphill. Well, it is the final push! It is on the summit. And now, push it, let it roll downhill, let it gather steam, let it clear the way for new ways of being, where all that is available is literally made available to the human race.
One only has to look at America’s experience with Islam to see how welfare and diversity do not mix. EU Muslims are over six and a half times more likely, proportionately, to be arrested for terrorist offences than American Muslims. In surveys well over two thirds of American Muslims said they believed they can make it in America with hard work, a higher proportion than Americans generally, reflecting their belief in the American Dream.
As I reflect on the life I saw her live and leave, it makes me so happy to have lived to know her. Donna was a wonderful woman who was so kind and generous to everyone.
Inks: Memento RoseBug ink and Pear Tart and Rich Cocoa
Maybe now is a good time to tell you the runner-up for the title of this blog post, which is:
so things have changed a lot in life in the past year! my last blog i listed a long list of resolutions and so far so good. I am planning on taking this Sunday as a me day as it's been a long 65 hr week at work. I wasn't able to clean all week as i had hoped because last Monday my washing machine broke. We purchased a referbed washer a few months ago and it's already died so the appliance place is coming to look at it Monday. I wasn't able to cook at all this week as food is low in the house and i haven't been home before 8pm any night. this is because Monday after I discovered the washer was broken, i went to go to work to find my car broke down. It's only 5 yrs old but now i need a new engine! the bills seem to be piling up so i don't think the resolution to not purchase any craft supplies will be a hard one to keep...i'm broke!
For all we do, all we acquire, all the connections we have with the modern world, we are who we are, a collection of stories passed down and absorbed in our DNA, even though it has been shaken up and re-positioned for a new environment.
Obnoxiously in your face about his beliefs? So often the “obnoxiousness” was simply strong argument or, in the case of religion, any argument. (I presume that by “lack thereof”, Pigliucci is referring to Hitchens’s atheism). Give me someone who argues strongly for his beliefs, and has evidence to back them up, than a milquetoast who avers that we have to speak softly to make our case and win minds. And Hitchens’s “obnoxiousness” was part of what made him both entertaining and persuasive.
The sentiment is definitely true for me and this tag will be on the wall in my new craft room if we ever get to move.
-Learn to notice your impatience and its roots.
As reported in the Simply-docs blog entry of 25th April 2012, a new cookie law is coming into force on 26th May 2012, in the form of the Privacy and Electronic Communications (EC Directive) (Amendment) Regulations 2011. Website owners will be required to gain permission from the users of the website before deploying cookies – a change which will affect the majority of commercial websites.
I think our immune systems are on strike because of overuse and abuse. I bet you didn’t know that immune systems are unionized. See, this blog is educational. Anyway, I suspect our immune system overuse is the university’s fault. People go to class sick. I know Luke will be going to class sick today. (He has an exam in P-Chem—the physics of chemistry.) And he’ll be exposing everyone there. It was even worse last semester when Jake and Ariel’s profs wanted them to come to class even though they had chicken pox. One pediatrician called it “Spreading immunity to the community.” Hmmm. I call it spreading sickness. But I’m just a mom, so why quibble over words?
The proper place for little children is in a loving home
What was I talking about? Sorry, easily side-tracked. Oh, yea–the birthday. We had pancakes and then we went to a paint your own pottery place and S painted his own plate and we attempted to get a handprint on there as well. It kind of looks like a hand and when we pick that up, I will show you.
I will probably wait until after the holidays to put in another order with Zappos just because I know I am going to get myself something. I don't want to spoil any of the gifts I might get on Christmas, so to make sure I don't buy myself something that some might get me, I think I'll wait. But, if you guys have yet to get all of your gift shopping done, you should check out Zappos. Their shipping is amazingly quick and you will not be disappointed!
Well yesterday wasn't as bad as I feared 'children-wise' - Eleri just had one friend to play with, and there is always so much less friction then! Although, at one point, I had a major panic as I did not know where she was - the last thing she had said was that she was going to ride around the square on her bike, and then when I was looking for her I couldn't see her bike - I thought she'd gone up the road to another house or to the park without asking me (and she would definitely have been in trouble if she'd done that!) But she was just next door with her friend - they had just taken their bikes inside the garden where I couldn't see them - whew, panic over!
Great day for a birthday party! Owen was so excited to turn 6 (he isn't 6 yet) but he had fun with his friends and cousins of course opening his presents! He enjoyed outside, cake, ice cream, and all his angry bird presents. He is such a joy and we are SO thankful for him!
Whilst whisking, slowly drizzle in oil.
The we can fix-it people. "If we just head-out and do "xyz" we can save the ecosystem." "There needs to be a better plan," they reason. Or, worse yet, they pin their hopes on the fact that it will not spread and while the destruction is devastating it can be contained.
A Dangerous Verdict in New Jersey
Today, on the 26th anniversary of his death, some friends collected quotes from his books. I've added a few of my own favorites as well.
So, if you want to show one particular thing in your photo and the rest isn’t important, at least not for that photo, choose a low F number. It doesn’t always have to be the lowest one your camera allows. See what works for that subject matter.
In February we were given our exam papers. They have seven prompts, and you choose one. My eyes immediately skipped to “Music and Dance - research appropriate sources and create your own piece based on the concept of music and dance” (or something to that effect). It could have been made for me.
I think we have found the right place and it's only a 5 minute drive from her home! It's a good feeling to know that she liked it and she is going to visit again to make sure it is the right place for her. There is so much work left to be done...a house to clean and prep for sale, figuring our her finances so she will be able to pay for the assisted living and all the other complicated issues that come with growing old.
1/2 quart spaghetti sauce (just because I had it on hand and I needed to use it up. Use tomato paste or pureed red peppers or rooster chili garlic sauce or harissa or something similar depending on what’s on hand and what seems good to you).
The lonely and the lost,
Perhaps that is why, according to Chen, his American “hosts” started to sound more like fellow-members of the international population-control mafia that is killing his country, than starry-eyed defenders of “human rights.”
The health effects of bombarding the skies with sulphur dioxide alone are enough to raise serious questions about whether such programs should even be allowed to proceed.
The Turks commited this act of barbarism as a means of enforcing dhimmi, second class status on the largest,most progressive and most cohesive non-Muslim group in the Ottoman Empire and removing them from being obstacles in Turkey's imperialist ambitions.
Recently, we just finished reading “The Raven” and “Annabel Lee” -(some loved the poems , while others hated them!) I can’t make everyone happy!
When things happen out of order, or opposite of their normal behavior, it portends ill-fortune. By this general template, all sorts of events in the world can be interpreted. Wolves and the like are supposed to howl at the moon, not the sun. While so doing the rising sun appeared like flames coming from the jackal’s mouth – making it more pronounced as an ill omen. A dog should be submissive to powerful humans, but here a dog was fearlessly growling angrily and barking in the face of the powerful King.
Now the tables were turned. Rather than being led by the Sanhedrin, he was witnessing to them as seen in that word “fathers” in Acts 22;l. They had not changed in their appraisal of Jesus Christ. Paul certainly had changed and he was not keeping quiet about it.
By the way, there’s a rainbow while we were walking! And beautiful sunset is also there. I’ll capture them next time we will be back in Pelaez Sport Center!
Later, I took some pictures of him, and during the whole time he kept saying just one word: roti, roti (food)…
We're stuck for a name for our farm. Because I want a sign at the end of our driveway marking the farm. Why not? My husband's ultra creative mind came up with "C&J Farm". Amelia is upset because her name isn't part of the farm's name and she should be upset. It is as much hers as ours. So I'm thinking of incorporating a block name from quilting and then having that quilt block put on our sign. Clever, yah?
We asked them if there weren't a farther-from-home place in the world they'd like to go. They couldn't think of one.
for dessert:
Your card just makes everyone smile. Amazing pattern papers, layout design, ribbon and sentiment. Your image ROCKS...and you colored it beautifully, it represents many visits with friends and time treasured. Marvelous inspiration.
From where I sit, business development is an everyday activity. Everyday as in 365 days a year. You see, the competition for new business gets harder and harder every year. If you truly want to grow your practice you have to work at it. You have knock on doors, attend events and work your referral network. The days of sitting back and waiting for business to beat a path to your door are long gone.
The funeral directors are not sure whether to have a funeral for M.J or a tupperware party
Mistakes made in Men's hair coloring:
Philadelphia's Steaks and Hoagies Portland Betsy Ross Imperial Golden Imperial Golden Ale
I confess: yesterday, I totally effed my plan. Today, I get back to it. And reshape it to address what I can't eff here.
If you fly out or into IAD or San Francisco, while going to Paris, check out the A380.
Varies, on fingertips throughout scalp and hair (nickel-size or sparingly)
He listed out very carefully and in detail what he wanted for me to work on. He even told me the reasons why he wanted those things done. I thought it was very sexy.
The language of the text allows the blame to shift from man to woman to serpent, and there the buck-passing stops because “the serpent’s mouth is stopped with dust.” But as hard as the words try to locate the fault in humans in general, and women and their animal counterparts specifically, the silences, the tensions, the contradictions whisper that, ultimately God is responsible for the “fallen,” or perhaps more to the point, the “realistic” state of creation.
image of Christ completely.
Hailing from Cornwall, England, Haysom began making low budget shorts as a teenager when his father gave him a VHS camera. After studying digital film at university, Haysom then relocated to London and worked as an art department assistant, cutting his teeth on music videos and short films. I caught up with him recently to discuss his latest project, the influence of the giallo and the morbid allure of black leather gloved killers, glinting switchblades and bloody ultra-violence…
for a meeting they’d set—
Last but not least, on Wednesday last week, I mentioned in one of my Miss Chatterbox's posts, Open to Interpretation, that I would do something special for those whose interpretation rocked my world ;) I'm not a giveaway kind of gal (sorry...), so I'd like to invite each of you to host my Wordless and (Not So) Wordless Wednesday post. Just let me know which date you'd like, and on that Wednesday, I'd feature your Wednesday post and link back to your blog (that way you would still post on your blog, and at the same time, it will be posted on my blog as well). Sounds good?
Product I’m drooling over: Still coconut oil. My good friend posted in my last blog to check health food stores so I think I will try that out this weekend. Thanks for the tip, Heather! Also, I have been eyeing the NAKED palette and the rumored similiar Nude ‘Tude palette from The Balm. I am dying to go to the Nordstrom Rack (about an hour away) and see if they still have any there.
firstly, and this is something that has bothered me for a while now, i get pretty much no comments or feedback here, apart from the odd guy saying one word comments like 'NICE' and 'MORE MAG DOWLOADS PLEASE'. now im not to bothered because the facebook page we set up seems to be building a pleasant community and im happy to talk there really.
In order to enter one must dress to impress. For Men:collared shirt, well-fitting jeans or slacks(sagging jeans will get you kicked out), and dress shoes. For Women: A dress and heels is the usual but professional attire is also accepted.
November should be less stress if you go with the flow. Consciously deciding what you are working on helps to bring balance and harmony to your world. During this month the focus is on keeping the garden growing. Fostering and promoting better relationships with those you love and care about, releasing the ones that don’t work and trusting that there are healthier possibilities for everyone involved. Feed what you want to grow and let the rest go their own natural evolution. People and situations always come and go, it is the cycle of life. Be thankful for the new and the old and utilize and be thankful for what you have now. Love with all of your heart, regardless!
for new dreams
switch to main color and knit 7 rows. Knit 5 more rows of contrasting color. Switch to main color and knit until piece measures 6.5 inches.
See the post below for all this week's Poetry Bus passengers. The Bus doors are still open - anyone who wants to hop on board can just leave a comment and your link will be added to the post below.
Garlic- 10 cloves, peeled and finely chopped
The usage of καρπὸς when referring to its extended meaning, not literal fruit, expressly indicates that it is not a question of deliberate, self-determined action on man’s part. Instead, it is that ‘fruit-bearing’ which follows from a believer turning to God and the power of the Holy Spirit working in him or her. I have three Pear Trees, one Crab Apple Tree, two Maple Trees, and one Oak tree in my yard. Their fruitfulness is unique to their nature. In the same way, spiritual fruit is automatic in the Christian. We do not produce fruit because of our effort, but because of the Holy Spirit working in and through us. God has changed our nature from what we were before regeneration to what we are now. This is why our Lord said in Matthew 7: 20:
Chicago is lead by last season’s MVP Derrick Rose. The Bulls are looking to take another step this season but have not been able to add onto the roster substantially. The team did add Richard Hamilton but for the most part, they are virtually the same team. They were connected to rumors about Dwight Howard but nothing has come to fruition on that front.
Madame Lefoux fan art.
But now I thank that policy greatly, because although we didn't realise it at the time, all we were concerned about was doing the best we could on each brief. We weren't thinking at the back of our minds 'would this win' or 'will I get a piece of awards-friendly work out of this brief?'
Things to mention: there are a lot of
Lunch Courgette and lemon pasta
I have some treats for you.
My main course was a tortellini in a Parmesan cream sauce with black truffles. This was perhaps the most surprising of the things I ate at this restaurant. Despite the clear presence of truffles, the truffle flavor didn’t really come through. The pasta was very good, but it just tasted like a very good tortellini in cream sauce, without much in the way of truffle. I would recommend the dish — as I said, it was quite good — but if you want something that’s very truffle-heavy, this isn’t the dish.
FIRE OF PATRAS
No one will call
I'm really looking forward to getting an in-depth gait analysis at the Boulder Center for Sports Medicine this week, as I think my mechanics (along with my admittedly undisciplined enthusiasm, i.e. boneheadedness) are the root cause of the frustration with my shin. Hopefully something is picked up on there, and I can come away with a specific plan of action for correcting some strength/flexibility imbalances.
I recently received a link to a very moving recording obtained by NPR from the Smithsonian. Taped by a British reporter in April 1945 at Bergen-Belsen, shortly after its liberation, it preserves for posterity the voices of Jewish camp survivors singing "Hatikvah," which later became the anthem of the State of Israel. Note that they are singing an earlier version, which has slightly different lyrics in the second stanza. Thank you, Ms Dessen.
THAI CHICKEN SOUP RECIPE
We ended the day at the Vatican. We went to the Vatican Museum, which had some of the most beautiful things! There were amazing sculptures, this amazing hall with maps on it, impeccable marble designs on the floor, and, of course, the Sistine Chapel! I was really excited about the Sistine Chapel, but the atmosphere in the Chapel was very disappointing. You’re herded into this room where you can’t move and you aren’t allowed to speak or you’re shooshed by the Swiss Guard, and you can’t truly appreciate the art. It’s really sad, because it is such a spectacular work of art, and you don’t really get to take it all in.
Hi all! Hope you had a great Monday! Over the weekend, I spent some time rearranging the media cabinet in our living room. I was getting bored with how the bookshelves were styled, thinking it had too few books and needed more color. I've gotten asked before about where we purchased the cabinet, but it's actually a built-in unit. You may remember how it's looked for the last year. I painted the back Jamestown Blue by Sherwin Williams when we first moved in.
Around 6.7 million patents were in force across the world in 2008, representing a 5.3% increase over 2007. Patents in force in China and the Republic of Korea saw double-digit growth at 24% and 10.1%, respectively. Residents of Japan and the US owned around 48% of total patents in force in 2008With regard to individual patent office growth rates,
Sorry, the whole "I didn't want to worry you, Honey." just doesn't work for me.
I'm sure if you google "space shuttle DC monuments" you will find at least 10,000 pics. It was a sight to see! I did snap a few shots but mostly what I did was stare and cheer. The flyby was at 1500 feet. It was so close I felt I could reach up and touch it. I opened my eyes wide and took it in.
Part of the problem is the very buggy nature of Blogger on my computer these days. Due to the hack, I can no longer long in as the administrator, only as a contributor. Therefore, I don't get the standard full module, and on top of that, the module I do get to use is buggy and inconsistent. For instance, the photo below should be centered. Blogger will not let me center it. After a frustrating day of working on the new house, I just can't stand to be teased and mocked by a computer.
Well, except there’s that pesky problem of too much freedom. Nick Saban may be happy to find that open roster spot, but his joy may be tempered by the departing youngster contemplating enrolling at a rival program. Or worse, what if the light bulb goes off and multiple players realize that this gives them the opportunity to be recruited all over again (what Infante calls a “transfer market”)? Most coaches – certainly most successful coaches – are control freaks. A transfer market isn’t likely to be a development they welcome.
That silence, where it stretches
My friend Angela, (whom I have known since high school) has graciously asked me to make the bedding for her little one due to arrive in September.Here is her post on what inspired her and helped her pick out what she did.
- First cook rice with some turmeric and 1tsp oil in it. Now take it in a bowl and Let it cool for half an hour so that the grains are not sticked together.
But light can't stay. You caught the train to a state that wouldn't scare.
As you touched me
But that’s not all cos we have another sponsor this week as well so it’s doubly nice – the FABULOUS
5. How cool is Batman’s flying “car”?
Barry crouched among the wicked on the first level of Whisper's hole. He was a respectable supplier to the grid, always sad, often frightened. He sat with his back to the wall, dipping his fingers into a bowl of gruel and sucking on them. The food dispensers had shut down minutes earlier and someone was bound to want more to eat, maybe his. He gulped it down, then rose up and dropped the dish into a slot at the stone wall. A sour faced woman in the next crevice growled at him and lashed out with her sharp fingernails, but he ignored her and moved on, trying to hug the wall. The railing scared Barry and his pulse raced whenever he had to slink along it.
Professor Elemental is a hip-hop MC like no other, combining the worlds of steampunk and chap-hop with a love for adventure, invention and the quintessential British cup of tea. M3 had a chat with Elemental about the benefits of social media, the disadvantages of copyright and his upcoming TV pilot…
I thought I might begin to share some of the details.....beginning with the invitations.
Click to enlarge.
I'm actively seeking God this afternoon as to why this experience had to happen. Why did I go through this trauma just to find him in my bed under the covers? Some answers are coming to me.
Father, we woke up in the depths of uncertainty this morning. What an appropriate reading this was for today! In the midst of this maelstrom of not knowing what is going to happen, I abandon myself to your certainty. I know that you are God, and I know that it is certain that you are in control of all things. But that’s all I know right at this moment (at least on this subject). I don’t know what this day is going to bring. As a matter of fact, at this very moment in time, I am utterly clueless! But my hope is in you. I am sure that you are God. I know whom I have believed… I thank you that you have put this faith in my heart.
Sowing the seeds in the soil of our lov
Book Resources
One of the most disturbing things about this situation, for me personally, is what I do NOT feel. I am horrified, appalled, disgusted, saddened, angry, betrayed, disappointed . . . . but I am not, on the whole, surprised.
Things have quickly changed within the past 24 hours! We can't believe that we're at this point now! God has been so good to encourage us with this little bit of "movement".
13 The Jean Genie
After that I think I’d toss a few bones to The Boys and some other friends who are in quasi-dire straits in the cash department. In an effort to avoid divulging who would get how much—I don’t wanna play favorites here—I won’t mention names or individual amounts. All-in-all, I think I’d earmark roughly another $100,000 for helping out my peeps; again, operating under the assumption that they’d all toss a few bones my way if the situation were reversed.
You just wipe it on with a white cloth and watch the magic happen. ;) We are not going to use the butcher block as a cutting surface, but linseed oil is perfect if you are planning to do so. It is food safe once it dries.
Welcome to another round of Simple and in Season. Each month I wonder whether it will be the last, but with 45 entries last month, which I had to split into savoury and sweet in the round-ups, I am encouraged to keep going and open up a new round! Thank you to everyone who took part last month.
I used a white eyeliner in my water line and used it lightly on my lashline.
'Tis the season ladies. Nab yourself a few extra packets of overpriced razors and get those gams ready for shorts. Before I dive into my short shorts post, I gotta say this, there are few things I hate overpaying for more than shorts. I mean, comon', shorts are typically 1/4 the length of a full pair of jeans, why shall we pay at $80-$100 for a pair of designer denim shorts?
What can't you buy? Umm... Music. We don't have a music shop. No trashy teen stuff or mainstream toys (you gotta brave the High Street for that). We're poor on porn and damn it, there's no weirdy beardy witchy emporium. But anyway. You don't even have to buy anything really. Just come along for the craic. And, if you see me (probably lurking in a corner at Woods or going oooh and aaaah at the fireworks), say hello.
Tell stories about us so people will know how we lived during the non cedar infested months.
It stands to reason that the more complex our tax code is, the more open it is to abuse. So, we’re making it simple to make it fair. America’s tax plan will do away with special breaks for a few so we can lower the tax rates for all. Our simpler, three-bracket design will assure that no American pays one penny more than his fair share.
I apologize for the format of this post, but I had all these random things that I wanted to put down and wasn’t sure how else to get them all out, so yeah, I took the easy way out!
I took an acting class in my third year of university just to fill an elective while studying Biology and English. I’d never done it before in my life, and I fell in love with it immediately. I had a very supportive teacher who basically convinced me that acting was something I could really do well at, as long as I committed to it with all my heart. So I did. The next thing I knew, I was living in Vancouver pursuing an acting career, and I haven’t looked back since. I’m thankful to have found it too, as I can’t really imagine doing anything else. I definitely had to pay my dues at first, and I feel really lucky to now be splitting my time between acting and directing.
Please don't feel discouraged if you're not at this point yet in your home. We were married for 13 years before this changed for us. I started by praying for about 2 years for our marriage before I saw the huge changes that I see now! But I believe that during those 2 years God was still protecting us through my prayers and changing our hearts for this day.
After about five tandas, he approached Margareta. He asked her what her name was as they stood waiting for the music to start with an accent that was clearly not Romanian. She told him that her traditional Romanian name, Margareta, meant "pearl."
He wants to get the government involvement out of the economy but believes the government should tell people what to do. “The idea is that the state doesn’t have rights to limit individuals’ wants and passions. I disagree with that. I think we absolutely have rights because there are consequences to letting people live out whatever wants or passions they desire.”
Thanks Elle for forever inspiring my ever-growing personal style.
Ask most mainstream Republicans, and they will say that 'unions' or 'the Democrats' destroyed Detroit. Not the people who live there, although on this FR thread, one person at least seems to get it:
For weeks, NEXT held the nation spellbound by publishing secret cables, courtesy of Julian Assange’s WikiLeaks, from American embassy officials in Nigeria to the State Department officials, in the process showing just how vacuous and how lacking in judgment most of Nigeria’s policy makers are.
also, we haf a new woofie furriend named mr chewy. he is sendin' us a buncha treats an' foods, an' we'll let you know how we likes 'em in the comin' weeks!!
Handheld blender
PHILOSOPHY: Believe, commit, do and deliver
My two sons were out walking their dogs a couple of weeks ago and this sweet little man got between them and walked home with them. Our oldest thought it was Buddy, a dog that gets out regularly but it was not.
I might be gagging while I eat it and probably couldn't swallow, but it might be worth it."
You may not be the exception. We counsel in the Church, for instance, that we ought to be old enough before we marry and we ought to know one another before we're married. Our courtships ought to be adequate. You may pick out a couple--he was 18 and she was 17 when they married--and see how happy and successful they've been. Yes, an exception! For every exception we can show you tens and hundreds, and I suppose thousands, who were not happy. Plan, young people, to marry into your own race. This counsel is good, and I hope our branch presidents are listening and paying attention. The counsel is good.
I cleaned out my closet the other day. I pulled everything out to sort and threw countless pieces of clothing into a donation pile without thinking. Then I came across a pair of maternity jeans that I only ever wore while I was pregnant with you. They were the first pair of maternity pants I bought, actually, and I loved them. They quickly became the most comfortable pair of jeans I had, and eventually the only ones I could still fit into. I wore them to the hospital. And then one day, after you were gone, I was wearing them--out of habit maybe, or just because they were still the most comfortable jeans I had--and I caught the back pocket on a nail on the deck and ripped a huge hole in them. Into the closet they went, forgotten through my entire subsequent pregnancy and following year, until just the other day, when I pulled them out and just sat with them for awhile, remembering.
Someone a row or 2 down sent a text.
As I return to the throne room, I will take my place in the palace of my King. I will hold my sceptre of authority and just like my King, I will be merciful, full of compassion and be kind-hearted. This, because I am becoming more like Him.
I'll see how he is in the morning and call the doc. . .
I fucking love this album. Amazing power-pop in the vain of Big Star from start to finish. I recently asked a friend of mine how he could be a fan of this album, and not a fan of Big Star because I think this sounds extremely similar to Big Star, and he said "because it's better than Big Star". I'm not sure if I agree with that entirely, but I really fucking love this album. Lately I've been throwing it on first thing in the morning while I get ready for work, great way to start the day. Ripped from the 20th anniversary edition vinyl reissue.
this didn't explain the pills and powders, of course, nor the pumpkin, but there was no denying that her dogs were lean and healthy, while boscoe was slightly chunky, ate like a starving man, and then farted continuously, like someone's elderly uncle. hmmm. perhaps diet was something i should think about.
You know that I always love bringing you a new Style Talk interview, and today's segment is really special. I have been inspired for years by the amazing interior designs by Bob and Cortney Novogratz. I first spotted the two in The New York Times with their six children. Their one-of-a-kind style immediately caught my eye, with rooms full of color, pattern, art, and absolutely fresh design. Rock stars in the design world, the couple brought us into their reality on the BRAVO show 9 By Design, showing us how they worked as a husband-and-wife team balancing both family life (with seven kids!) and their design firm all at once. It was an inspiring story for all up-and-coming husband-and-wife duos, like AphroChic! And this year they are back on TV with their new show Home by Novogratz on HGTV which is all about the couple's amazing design work.
The Rocky Road to Dublin by The Young Dubliners
Saturday morning I was dreaming about househunting, and was just rejecting a house because it was in an inferior school district (what a boring dream. Why wasn't I dreaming about flying or fighting aliens?), when we were abruptly awakened by our door slamming open and Kimmy rushing in with a handful of chocolate coins and her new toothbrush left by the Tooth Fairy.
In related news, ‘Holy Land’ is a short drama series that is only 4 episodes long. The storyline revolves around a homeless teen who wanders the streets, but experiences love and friendship, as he takes on boxing.
Here’s the thing. My husband isn’t just some random guy with no education or experience who ran out West with hopes of making some quick cash. He has a college diploma in electrical engineering. He’s a 4th year apprentice Industrial Electrician, very close to become a Red Seal Certified Journeyman. He has a ton of safety training, and approximately 4 years experience in the pulp and paper industry. And we can’t find a job for him anywhere in Nova Scotia.
Ann Arbor, MI
One form of literature curiously absent from the collection? The pulp and crime fiction of the 1930s and 40s. The grimy, simply written tales of gangsters, stewing the ingredients of film noir, were sold as cheaply produced paperbacks and are rarely considered true capital-L 'literature'.
- Querying before your manuscript is ready
the losses as at present (2012)
You were my best friend
A few months later, Writer Beware got a flurry of of questions about Delmont-Ross from writers who'd seen publicity materials for Gross's book, or had read some of the interviews he was doing to promote himself (in which, by the way, he provided conflicting details about the contest). This time, Ann and I decided to investigate.
6 F. William Engdahl, China and the Congo Wars: AFRICOM. America’s New Military Command, November 26, 2008, accessed in http://www.globalresearch.ca/index.php?context=va&aid=11173
I finally have my deck of forty.
It’s been a pretty busy week, but that’s good.
We've been navigating caring for a child with special needs for over two years now (which, let's be honest, feels a bit like 10 years but that's for another blog post...). The team of doctors we have now are completely different from the ones we started out with originally. This is because over time and along the way, it has become clear which doctors were not a good fit for the way we ultimately desired to facilitate Bennett's care.
My little helper would put one finger puppet (on the rack) and then set one aside for her Pre-school class. I was making little piles of my own. As the afternoon wore on, here's how the conversation went:
Our theme for March is "EASTER"
indeed his condition is already deteriorating. My family has only recently lost my mother so this makes it very difficult for me not to be here for my father and family. You will have to forgive me but I have to tell you now so you can at least have time to inform all fans.
To the question “Is there a conspiracy to destroy the white race?”, I have to say in my view the answer is considerably more complex than some of my fellow travellers would like to believe. What we face is not a single malevolent conspiracy, but a many headed hydra formed of any number aims ambitions, hatreds and ideologies, all of differing degrees of malevolence, which have come together, on the coat tails of a historical conspiracy, to attack us at a time when we are at the least able to defend ourselves.
So, I am happy to announce that I will not keep up the Joneses. I don’t have to spend money to impress other people. At the end of the day we have to make ourselves happy and being in debt does not make me happy.
For me, it is always different.
E. school chums
You're trapped before you realize.
Science’s greatest and most pragmatic assumption for us is that there is a world about which we can know something. Descartes’ Cogito Ergo Sum takes our egos – the “I” – as the first proof for this assumption. Setting aside the problems associated with this leap in logic, we can ask, how are we to represent the role of the ego within this lineage, of which Western science is still very much a part in many ways? Science seems to have ignored the words of its guru!
Only through experience of trial and suffering can the soul be strengthened,
Lotus Seeds (Lianzi), 10 pcs
Disaster Plans
A special note to Ida: You do not appear to have a blog that I can follow, so will leave a comment for you on my own post. Thank you for always reading my posts and leaving a comment, I really do appreciate it and always love to hear from you :)
When I was pregnant, I went on bed rest at 24 weeks. I began pre-term labor shortly thereafter, and visited the hospital seven times over the next ten weeks.
To manhood’s branch and trunk;
I have been doing a bit of sewing, but have been very relaxed and lazy.....really haven't gotten much accomplished. I started feeling like I had a lot of things piling up...time to take inventory!
At the mo shes sleeping, doing ok, but a few hours ago i took her temp and it was a worrying number...40,5, and that is very high.
This “right track” of MacBain’s defeats our Methodist (Christian) heritage of salvation by faith alone. There is no right track, no proper recipe to follow, no checklist of dos and don’ts that make us good and others bad. There is only faith. Yet, all too often, we assume anyone who doesn’t believe what we believe is already burning. Until we realize that the purpose of faith is not about judging others, but about accepting our role as loved and loving people of God, then we will not get past all this bickering and fighting that exists in our world.
Pretty boring.. and not very laser targeted. You are basically coming off like the 90% of network marketers in the world who walk around asking everybody within 3-feet of them that same damn question.
*FUNERAL HOME – Radio Spot
Mike Shanahan’s record with quarterbacks, as of late, has not been good. The trade for Donovan McNabb was ill advised and subsequent handling of the veteran was shoddy and a distraction. Mike and Kyle (O-coordinator) Shanahan’s propensity to squeeze quarterbacks into a system, rather than build a system around a quarterback, is the main concern. I watched McNabb operate for years in Philadelphia and when Andy Reid converted him to a pocket passer, he lost his effectiveness. It take courage at the NFL level to play to your guy’s strengths rather than avoiding injuries. I love what Carolina is doing with Cam Newton in this regard. RG3 is a mobile quarterback and Kyle Shanahan had great success in Houston with Matt Schaub who is a pocket passer, and seems wedded to a system ill-suited for RG3. Here’s hoping the Shanahans can adjust their thinking. Also the shortsightedness of even giving Beck a chance was a negative ding because this guy was not even close to NFL caliber and Shanahan should have seen that. Why did he sit on the bench for five years in Miami? Anyone with enough talent to play the position would have gotten a chance and Shanahan has been around the game long enough not to get fooled by that.
142These moss-grown domes with spiry turrets crown'd,
The pie-in-the-sky version of this plan includes not asking for permission from the city.
For further information please check the Links page
Gingerdead Man 2 is half-baked stupid nonsense. Nothing makes me feel an Old Scrooge like failing to enjoy a film about a homicidal gingerbread man. Although, after watching both movies back-to-back, I do have the strangest craving for gingerbread. Hold the Busey.
Think "poochy."
Sent: Monday, April 09, 2012 6:27 PM
Unlike your ancestors who ate and still died,
- Do your mixes come from a manufacturing
to the place where you dwell.
It's much easier to talk to young people. We all know what to do. You start with a dopey pop music track, you add quick cuts of people with bad haircuts and tattoos, you mix in a few half-naked models pretending they can act, then slip in a few product shots. (For a primer in how to sell this vapid formula to boneheads, don't miss the "The Pitch.")
I’m not talking about “worship music” here. I’ve worshipped many times to music that isn’t “Christian” or “worship music,” and it doesn’t make my worship any less pure or unworthy.
It wasn't overwhelmed suburbanites who ordered French embassies around the world to reduce the issuing of visas to France to a trickle, while setting hard expulsion quotas for the police here. The succession of restrictive laws that, under the pretext of foreignness, assaulted the liberty and equality of millions of people who live and work here was not the work of on the loose "populists."
The terrorists have also found their targets among foreigners in the country, as well as across international borders, in Afghanistan. A huge ransom was paid in Pakistan, for instance, for the release of two French journalists, Herve Ghesquiere and Stephane Taponier, who were abducted on December 30, 2009, by the Qari Baryal Afghan Taliban faction in Afghanistan’s Kapisa Province. An Afghan Taliban militant close to the group’s central command revealed, on condition of anonymity, “A ransom was paid — an enormous amount — millions of dollars. The money was handed over in Pakistan.” Significantly, the Haqqani Network and the Afghan Taliban work in close collaboration with TTP, both to launch terror attacks and in activities like abduction-for-ransom.
Alan Garner: Or rapies.
As a guy do you know the various cuts of women’s undergarments? If so, I’m not sure if that’s cool or creepy LOL. For underwear, bikini cut. For bras, demi.
Today i added the pieces of Daniel to the mix. Now admittedly i had to do some extra research because all of the information i need can’t be found in Daniel to put the outline together.
Pinch of pepper
Sam: (sigh) I guess, get that big thing over here.
I added the black pepper and basil to the recipe, mostly because my basil plant looked like it wanted to be used and I thought the black pepper would compliment the tomato soup. I was really stringent with the method this time. I left the dough to rise and re-rise for as long as possible and pre-heated the oven well in advance. The recipe suggested the rolls would take 20-25 minutes to cook but mine took 35 minutes, I think this is due to my rubbish oven rather than the recipe being inaccurate. I also had the oven turned up high for the first 10 minutes to crisp up the top.
NEWS FLASH: Life is not perfect. Sometimes things to wrong. When they’re not too terrible, could we please stop acting as if they are? And when they aren’t anyone’s fault, can we please stop pointing fingers? And, by the by, when there’s no one else to blame, can we please stop blaming parents? — L.
"...apart from the half nelson" Diddy appends, demonstrating one on himself somehow. Repeat.
Sugary kisses,
To add further to my credentials as a misfit I live on a boat. Through deviousness and manipulation I have even managed to convince my wife Jinna to live on a boat. No one is, after all, free of sin. To be truthful I have lived on three boats. I think I finally have it right this time.
Ralegh was quick to improve upon Berreo's methods; and even on those of Christopher Columbus ninety-six years before, the first European Discoverer of the island, who had won a reputation for 'sweetness and benignity' unparalleled by his later countrymen. But his business instincts had been a bit sharp for the natives, who still grumbled over their greatgrandfathers' slow disillusionment after Columbus had struck a good bargain for himself by trading a large number of brass chamber-pots to them as an interesting novelty, whose value had quickly worn off as news, and left the recipients doubtful as to their use. They might indeed have earned their cost and keep as cooking-pots with their additional convenience of a handle, but their intended use as a 'convenience', in a world so warm and wide and indecent, was, so Columbus tells us, 'but coldly met'. His sweetness and benignity to the natives also sounds rather cold and negative; for the chief instance given of it is that he refused to allow his crew, even when hungry, to kill and eat them.
How do we work with personal assistant services and our support systems?
One of my favourite pieces has to be the giant stone griffin, almost like a giant maltese falcon, whilst he portraits of Hogwarts saw over 350 hand-painted ‘masterpieces’ showing the wizards and witches of times gone by.
‘We want to train students to think independently, frame their own views, and argue and defend them,’ he said.
enable us to walk humbly in Your presence and may You
TAMPA
* Link up Anything, as long as you think it is Artistic, creative and Fun!. it does NOT have to be a craft, although we love those too! You can share food, crafts, activities, shops, advice, inspiration, Fun discussion topics, and much much more ! Anything that used your brain to write and is Family Friendly!
Once I started forgiving myself not updating my blog, it takes me ages to get back. I don’t mean to give this up at all but self-discipline is needed.
- Kimi ni Todoke (i love the pairing kazehaya and sawako. sawako’s so innocent so kazehaya’s finding a hard time^^)
You can sleem on the lake
Information as posted by Boere Krisis Aksie (B.K.A.)
The thing is, noone notices. Yet. And I'm okay with that. The reason is that the HCG drops actually don't pinpoint one area of fat. They liquify the fat everywhere. So I'm losing a little bit of fat from all over. Isn't that great?! My arms, stomach, legs, feet, ankles, & even my chest are all smaller. Not much, but I notice a big difference in the way my clothes (& shoes/boots) fit me now.
Myth #4: I have to be inspired to write. Not! I recommend writing every day. There are days that I am able to write 1000 words and other days I write 2, but I write every day. Sometimes I’ll go back and read what was written the previous day and delete the whole section; but setting a goal like: I am going to have a first draft ready in three months, is not nearly as effective as: I’m going to write 500 words per day. Then reward
Lunch ate, cat fussed, jobs done we had to leave for the school pickup, when we got there some people were laughing and joking, then I saw Jackie and Rob walk down the drive looking rather sombre, I just thought Jackie was tired, having being on holiday and then having to do all the washing etc. after the holiday, this wasn’t so.
Jesus tells them that if he testifies about himself, it isn’t valid; there is another – John the Baptist – who has testified about him. Jesus tells the Jews that he knows that they’ve sent messengers to John asking about Jesus, and John told them that Jesus was the Son of God. Human testimony can’t compare with divine revelation, but John was “a lamp that … gave light, and you chose for a time to enjoy his light.” But, Jesus continues, “I have testimony weightier than that of John. For the very work that the Father has given me to finish, and which I am doing, testifies that the Father has sent me.” God’s prophets have also testified concerning Jesus, and wrote it down in the Scriptures. The teachers of the law diligently study the Scriptures, thinking it holds the key to eternal life, but somehow they have failed to recognize and understand what the Scriptures were actually saying. They refuse to come to Jesus and have life.
They point out that the application site forms part of the strategic gap identified by the Adur District Council Local Plan 1996 to ensure that Shoreham and Lancing remain as distinct separate conurbations. This has had indirect benefits for the NP enabling a strip of largely
statue of the reverend fred shuttlesworth, a leader in the civil rights movement. i saw a letter to him from president obama somewhere and obama said "i stand on your shoulders." his house was bombed. and a mob of klansmen attacked him after he tried to integrate one of the schools by enrolling his children there. he was knocked unconscious. President Clinton awarded him a presidential citizens medal. in 2008 the birmingham airport was renamed the birmingham - shuttlesworth airport!
Precarious Housing in Canada (2010) is a powerful, new research and policy report from the Wellesley Institute. Using the most comprehensive and current data, research and analysis, Precarious Housing sets out a pragmatic, five-point plan targeted to the millions of Canadians who are living in substandard, over-crowded and unaffordable homes – plus those who are living without any housing at all.
City Press can reveal that more than R2m of the deposits into Malema’s trust in 2010 were made in cash.
Included in this kick-off is Eric's famous Dutch-Oven Cooked Pulled Pork Sandwiches and our new addition of "Wash-Tub" chili.
Cook the pearl onions, green chilies & salt in 1 cup water till the onions are soft .I don't chop the onions, I use them as whole.
Value: $150
After that, things got really bad. But I won't go into it because I'm not one of those people who goes on and on about their illness in graphic and disturbing detail.
Make Payable To: Fantasy Dreams S/B
Triathlon provided that and more. I met a lot of cool folks through the sport and I also got better in three sports. Triathlon lead me to teach Spinning, ChiRunning and also become a triathlon coach. I’m glad I took the step. And the three sports really help with the cross training benefits so you’re not just doing the same thing to your body all week.
As Wasson puts it , “What Audrey offered – namely to girls – was a glimpse of someone who lived by her own code of interests, not her mother’s, and who did so with a wholesome independence of spirit.” She was a woman that men were attracted to and women could get inspired by (certainly not threatened by) and she was impossible to take your eyes off. So with this in mind, you can imagine what that opening image in the film conjured – without a stitch of dialogue.
When this Trope is refuted the Genderist will usually switch over to the “Brain Sex/Lady Brain” trope. Or just call you a “bitch” or a “fish”. Possibly threaten you with violence or murder.
improv scenes where she's played with just about everyone from Peter Brötzmann or Roscoe Mitchell to God Speed You! Black Emperor or Eugene Chadbourne. This fact signals that this is demanding music. It's busy, loquacious and angular and squarely in debt to the 'new thing' of the sixties.
I would sit quietly outside the room with my back against the door frame and listen to him work. I knew each of the tools by sound: the gentle whir of the hand drill, the shush of the plane, the musical zip and warble of the saw. Dad moved from one workbench to another, tutting and murmuring to himself.
I tell people I was raised by BOTH my grandparents and my mother (but that’s not entirely accurate).
Anyhow, there ya have it. Our baby girl's first birthday party. It was a lot of work, but so absolutely worth it. Everyone had a nice time and our little guest of honor had a blast. Am I crazy to say that I'm already thinking about next year's bash?
Check what he whipped up..
Jake’s mom signed him up to volunteer at a Special Olympics basketball event in Shrewsbury which he said he walked into“completely blind.” He was assigned to S.T.E.P, a basketball team from Lowell. He told me that they were a new team at the event and their whole fan section was there. He said everyone on the team had family members there chanting their names and cheering for the team.
Combine milk, sugar, yeast and oil in a small bowl.
Kurt Angle is talking to Kazarian, to try to get him ready for his match with Roode. Good luck tonight, and do some damage. Bring your A-Game.
5-At one time as a teenager I was in 4 different singing groups as a 1st soprano in my church.
Mark Beard (1 book of Polaroid transfers, 1992)
4. Bill Not Phil
Before that I must mention that we will be having a stand at the Happy Stampers Festival at Port Sunlight (near Liverpool) soon, as usual. This is a lovely one day, ticket only, event being held on Saturday, 12 May, and I believe there are only 63 tickets left as I speak. If you would like to visit please go to the Happy Stampers NW Site to check out the event and purchase your tickets. We would just love to see you there! We only attend this show (twice a year) at the moment, as we now have several other companies who take our products to shows, and we like to give them the free opportunity to promote our products. However we do love this particular show - dedicated to rubber stamp lovers, and if you are a Blog Follower of this blog please come and say hello, introduce yourself, and collect a free rubber stamp from the latest issue with our compliments. There's still time to add your name to our Followers list!
I’d spent long enough dreaming about being a published writer and then actually finishing a book, it was the next logical leap to go for it and see what happened.
Good morning! In my few years as a member of this church I have stood in this pulpit on several occasions, the three sermons that I have had the privilege to write and deliver have all been delivered here first. In this process of learning how to write and deliver a sermon one of the most important lessons that I have learned is that when you stand in the pulpit your capacity to impact the hearts and minds of the people in the pews stands in direct relationship to your willingness to expose and lay bare the most precious, tender, and vulnerable parts of yourself and your own spiritual struggles.
Runs swiftly up indicating war and defiance—and now the halyards
Beginning at the bottom of the skirt measure up 8-1/2" and make a mark
Before I conclude, another coincidence comes to my mind! The TITANIC went down on 15/4/1912. The digit sum of this date (1+5+4+1+9+1+2=23=2+3) is 5; it went down 5 days after it had begun its voyage; 1517 (digit sum: 1+5+1+7=14=1+4=5) people lost their lives; so, is it any surprise that I am giving it 5 stars?
“It’s simple my child. You simply ask your inner self what it is you wish to know. Then you quietly wait for an answer. Now go on. Give it a go,” he urged.
Tra tutte le partecipanti al Challenge ne verrá estratta una con il sistema Random che riceverá in regalo questo stupendo timbro Stampavie Sarah Kay "Elodie in her Garden"
There comes a time when warriors lose a battle. Defeat comes to us at some point in our lives. More and more, I have come to regard it as an old enemy, always there to snatch my happiness away.
The cultural critique is there if you want to see it, but it’s perfectly easy to let all of the heavy stuff slide right past and just enjoy Kermit’s mix of self-doubt and optimism, Piggy’s egocentrism, Fozzie’s bad jokes, and the mere presence of all these Muppets back on screen. Gonzo, Rowlf (I’ll tell you about my Rowlf nightmare some day), Scooter, and the rest might not get as much screen time as you’d like, but they’re here and they’re contributing and it simply feels good to see them doing their thing again.
In today’s competitive and ever changing publishing industry, versatility is a necessity -which explains the success of Houston resident Doris Fisher. Former kindergarten teacher turned author, Doris has published multiple books, articles and mind-stretching puzzles in a variety of genres. Recently I caught-up with Doris and chatted with her about life, inspiration and her advice for debutant writers.
Caroling, wassailing the trees, burning the Yule log, decorating the Yule tree, exchanging of presents, kissing under the mistletoe, honoring Kriss Kringle the Germanic Pagan God of Yule
The “Ontario Lottery and Gaming Corporation (OLG)” want’s to expand their enterprise PERIOD. Canada’s biggest city can potentially have a full fledged casino, minutes away from the downtown core. The potential consequences (if this falls through) can make or break Torontonian’s livlihood and ultimately the health of our government.
For more information on the author and his books, including his contact details, visit Peter Lovesey’s official website at: http://peterlovesey.com.
"Hey you guys! We decided we are going to the top, OK? You ready to go?"
These babies are 48% off!
8. Solsbury Hill 6:21
Hello Everyone and Welcome to the Just Magnolia and hAnglar and stAnglar Challenge. I'm Suzan and I am so excited to be hosting my very first challenge! We hope that you will join with us again this week for a fun challenge!
Richard von Sturmer / We Batten On / 38
Cushing is playing the villain to Christopher Lee’s good guy professor, who isa friend an protector of the family. The interplay between these two is always great, but it isstrange that Lee does ot show up until halfway through the film in order to play the hero. It violates conventional wisdom is have the hero come in so late and it did bug me. Though not as much as the goofy looking Gorgon.
On the way to school this morning, Chickie was on her scooter; Zoodle was on his balance bike (more on that in a future post); and I was walking. There's a little downhill driveway that leads to a neighborhood pool, a few minutes from the school. They like to ride their wheeled vehicles down the driveway while they wait for their slow mama to catch up to them.
Her gallery includes art in different media, including oil, acrylic, digital, ink, and even 3D. The dominant theme appears to be pretty girls and fauna… who can disagree with that? d’Errico is also amazing in her use of saturated color. To view more of her art, visit Camilla d’Errico’s website!
It evolved into a monochromatic nod to family history. I'm not sure why. Perhaps, it is because Kellie has started indexing the 1940 Census. Did she tell you? She actually really likes doing it, and I don't mind being called to her computer on occasion to help decipher names.
This may not be altogether altruistic as, of course, if the other venues’ posters were removed, it would be less competition for the Stand’s all-year-round profile in Edinburgh.
Before going any further, I want to express congratulations to the other finalists in Stuffer Shack’s Site of The Year Contest: Gnome Stew, Dungeon’s Master, G*M*S Magizine and Nearly Enough Dice. Everyone should click through those sites for wonderful RPG content. And take some time to explore the over 30 blogs nominated for the Site of The Year Contest.
we live on the second floor of an older home... at tree-top level.
I define my practice as working with old buildings, with the definition of “old” having a certain amount of flexibility. For some projects, I’ve also stretched the definition of “building.” Some of the buildings are recognized as historic, some are designated as protected landmarks, and some are eyesores. Once in a while, I work on a building that makes me debate, internally, what the purpose of preservation really is.
I get over him a little more each day, but sometimes I just don’t want to. I don’t understand why we can’t at least attempt to try having a real relationship. I have my hypotheses, but never scientifically proven. I know I deserve better than what I let myself put up with. But I’m tired of waiting. I have 2 beautiful little boys who need a positive male influence and I’m beginning to feel like they aren’t going to get it until it’s too late.
Dr. Seus
and move on the next. I’d be happy for you after that,
This blog started as a place to document our move to the country, the construction of our home, White Verandah, and some life along the way... What happens here, on this blog, in White Verandah is all real... Our life.. Of course there are parts that you dont see, you dont hear... I am a normal mother of 2 babies, working part time, wife, friend and housewife...
Delete copyright layer
Her dad angrily glared back and barked, “Stop teasing her and give it back before I turn the car around and go back home!”
There does come a time when most kids who loved hugs as a young child, no longer want to be hugged. Be attuned to this and don’t insist. The reasons are many and complex, mainly having to do with growing awareness of sexual feelings.
If the experience can be reduced to anything at all, it's the feeling of authenticity. An emotional authenticity, with these moments and interactions displaying a rich understanding of human behaviour - a warmth and compassion that makes the occasional critique seem all the more pointed, or keenly observed - and an overwhelming sense of time and place, of life, continually moving, crashing, then caressing, like waves against the rocks. Most films provide entertainment; some even inspire great thoughts and feeling; it's a select few that are powerful enough to teach us how to live.
“Ah, ’tis always nice to have a Good Wind.” The hamadryad laughed heartily.
Well, if the prospect of new clients and the ability to source quality, beautiful papers weren't enough...Envelopments has giving me yet another reason to love them!
So welcome one and all to 2010, join us, walk around but never question, never look beyond the wall, never glimpse the truth or indeed speak of it, just enjoy the freedom they give you and be thankful for it, in other times they took that first. Such a hardy people ,such tenacious men and women, even amongst death and destruction, in the midst of evil and its adherents the human spirit transcended, red terror gripped but each mortal loss steeled the people, tempered their blade until laid waste tyranny was vanquished, today a friendly guise, today cameras for all, today speak this way ,act this way, be this way, enforcement with a smile, a shroud engineered to fit us all.
Storage
Saturday, we're having a garage sale. Of course, we don't know how to have a plain old garage sale like regular folk. Instead, ours will be more like a party. We've already invited our friends and plan on having plenty of donuts on hand to entice the masses. We'll pass on having coffee, because knowing me, in my heightened garage sale state, I will no doubt sell the coffee maker if someone makes me an offer...lol! That would make Kirk very sad (and grumpy). Last time we had a garage sale, we started at 8:00am and sold everything by 9:15am and there was no short supply of stuff. Hope this one goes over just as well. Oh, and let me just add that I will have some craft stuff for sale (stamps, embellishments, etc.) so if you're in the Albuquerque area, stop by 3840 Sunbird Dr NW and pay us a little visit. Bring cash...hahaha!
6. details details. i will never be FP because i don’t include enough details in my writing. There’s a blog i follow by a guy named frank. while i think i’m skilled at essays, his attention to detail makes my work look like i might get 2nd place in a 6th grade essay contest when the rest of the class is out with the chicken pox.
Stay 5 nights, earn 1 bonus night toward elite status (max of 3 elite qualifying nights).
I cross a small street where I stumble on the uneven pavement. When I look down, I notice streetcar rails. I look up at a street sign. Gravier!
Then, after a balmy 60 degree week of weather, we have a freak snowstorm, which brings 12 inches of heavy, sloppy snow. (This October storm was definitely a record-breaker for the state of Connecticut since we usually don't see snow until late November or December.)
Me: I just ordered a Primeval ARC shirt!!!
An important factor while choosing party dresses is the type of personality you have. Women with different heights, body shapes and figures need to make the right choice among available party attires. Also, women with different skin complexions should choose dresses in colors that complement in an apt manner.
Blood filled with nutrients passes through the liver where toxins are filtered out and excreted as solid waste matter. This purified blood then travels to the kidneys where any excess elements form urine and are then eliminated from the body. As urine passes through the urethra, it is a sterile solution.
She is awake more during the day and starting to coo at us.
Add the peeled, boiled and mashed sweet potatoes, onions, cilantro and chilies and knead into the dough either with hand or in the mixer for about 4-5 minutes on medium speed until it forms into a nice ball.
5. Brighton belt, $1
So what is the lesson? Stay in School, Stay Classy.
When I arrive on Saturday, the choice for the punters has been simplified still more. Our job is mostly telling people: “No, we have no fruit beer left. We have the two German lagers and the three Czech lagers, and the two bottles you see in the fridge.” It’s the first time the Foreign Bar has been quiet. I’ve hardly had a chance to have a drink myself for the last couple of nights and am pretty sure I’ve drunk less cask ale during this festival than in a normal week!
My next door neighbors have a beautiful bush that yields lovely pinkish-purple blooms. They are big and I have admired them daily. When I walked over today to snapture them, I realized I was almost too late. Beauty fades so quickly, but cherishing something or someone can last forever.
Nicholas D. Kristof in his NYT article: “The furor over Greg’s work breaks my heart. And the greatest loss will be felt not by those of us whose hero is discredited, nor even by Greg himself, but by countless children in Afghanistan who now won’t get an education after all. But let’s not forget that even if all the allegations turn out to be true, Greg has still built more schools and transformed more children’s lives than you or I ever will.
The Power of Knowing
When you’re such a gentleman
However, when the plea of the accused was taken in the court, he pleaded not guilty to the two-count charges brought against him.
“For I speak to you Gentiles, inasmuch as I am the apostle of the Gentiles, I magnify mine office.”
In a large bowl, mix together the flour, salt, cardamom and baking powder. Rub the coconut oil/butter into the flour with your fingertips until it resembles crumble mix. Then stir through the dried fruit, nuts and orange zest.
I feel good
3rd layer:
The smile that spread across his face was the most priceless and precious thing ever. He started jumping around, repeating, "Yes, yes, yes" to himself and bolted inside the store. I am still amazed how fast toddlers are.
we can vicariously enjoy it
She refused treatment for her condition, continuing to study and appearing indifferent to physical discomfort. After months living as a “Skeleton clad only in Skin” (Pearce, J.), she died of starvation.
Who is missing from CUC decision making?
Meet at:
You will need lots of zest from these citrus fruits, so clean them well.
“Oh crud, we need to do our taxes,” I recently told my husband as I do every year around this time.
These numbers are a bit higher than the ones the LDS Church supplies to the state for demographic purposes.
Anyway, I thought that I get back into the groove of blogging now that Fashion Week is starting here in the city. I must say - *starstruck* moment - I was at Whole Foods the other day and Karlie Kloss was definitely shopping for marinara sauce right next to me. Of course I was too geeked to say anything to her. (I'm pathetic). But it was quite exciting.
Therefore thus says the Lord, who redeemed Abraham, concerning the house of Jacob: " . . . They will hallow My name, And hallow the Holy One of Jacob, And fear the God of Israel. These also who erred in spirit will come to understanding, And those who complained will learn doctrine.” (Is. 29)
For those of you that are a part of your own team...Congrats!! Please post a link to your page below in the comments. I want everyone to have an opportunity to see the wonderful community we have that works so hard to change the world for those that sport designer genes.
The other thing that captures my heart about this story is the picture of Solomon, wisest man on the planet, kneeling with hands in the air, praying this magnificent prayer before the people. Can you imagine what it would be like if this happened today? Our president (or any ruler), kneeling in reverence, praying to God in front of throngs of people. Unfathomable.
Cardamom declines on sluggish demand
Favorite Cheese: I was fortunate to taste a new cheese coming to the U.S., the Gligora Dairy Paški Sir, a Croatian cheese made from ewe's milk. It smells of grass and herbs and the taste is complex, with a tasty melange of herbal flavors, a mild creaminess and hints of salt. The cheese has a cool story behind it as well, and any cheese lover should try to find this new and exciting cheese.
Here's the Garden of Eden... Doesn't it look GREAT!!!!
Terry pioneered women’s specific bicycles, and as you can see, the front wheel is smaller than the rear wheel on my 2002 Terry Symmetry. The thinking behind the design was that when you shrink the top tube to accommodate the shorter reach of a small woman, you have to shrink the front end of the bike to avoid overlapping your toe and front wheel on sharp turns.
12.Grey-Brown.Sable....Md Green......12 Fingers & Toes
